I think I will take a break then and the next day will take some time to prepare myself for the next semester. There is plenty to do if I am honest, not least because my line manager has held me up with pontificating about what I should be doing. I do not see why they should be telling me what to do as I am teaching the same course as before, but that is just their way; they like to feel useful – or should that be useless?
No, wait, hang on...
Think about it. Do you have a closet full of clothes yet wear the same jeans 3 times a week? How about shoes, don’t get me wrong I love pretty shoes and I used to have a closet full, now I can’t wear them anymore, but I still have a closet full of cute but comfortable shoes.
Maggie Moos-free ice cream cone. And this is a massive ice cream cone, great for sharing. They also recently sent a coupon for a free milkshake. Also big enough to share. Cheesecake ice cream + snickers = perfect bliss
Here’s what they said (I leave it to you to figure out who said what):
After dinner, the rest of the night was spent hanging out in our rooms, and relaxing after a long day. It was so nice to be able to fall asleep to complete silence and pitch blackness. Oh, how I’ve missed that!
This is the top story across the country right now, and Avaaz is the best placed community to finally put an end to this crooked collusion between the government and the Murdoch Mafia. Sign the urgent petition to remove Hunt and send this to everyone."
Lots of kids mean lots of parents, dads and moms who are valuable sources of information and advice. In this book, dozens of them share with you the wisdom they gained while parenting kids with special needs.
I really feel bad for all of those people...
‘No official permits’
Leo’s girlfriend Audrey Rose is poised for her own share of success. As one of Florida’s top high school swimmers, Audrey dreams of college swimming stardom. But there’s an obstacle to her glorious rise to the top. Her number-one supporter--her father--is in prison for murder.
I know this may come as a surprise, as it did to me, but these little people in my house, the small, sometimes extremely loud, extremely smelly ones actually grow. I should know this. I have pencil marks, lines with dates and names smudged next to them, on my wall in the hallway near the laundry room documenting their growth. I watch them, everyday, shove gobs and gobs of food down their mouths in order to fuel their growth. Every time I dress them I notice that the space between the hem of their pants and the top of their shoes gets a bit wider.
At any price below $15, this is a pretty decent twelve-pack, with two very good beers, and two other good ones. Do what I do and bring it to a party and give the lagers out first. But do see that you make sure to get it somewhat fresh as it seems to go bad quicker than most.
Oh what a good idea, said my drunken self and off I went.
Now that I've gotten that out of the way, I will move on to tell you what the main purpose of this blog is. I'm going to try very hard to write here every single day, detailing what things I did that I learned from. Whether it's an interesting conversation with a friend on world politics, watching ants collect food, writing poetry, or anything else rewarding I can come up with. This is mainly for my benefit and enjoyment, but you're more than welcome to read along as well.
First blog entry, done.
“I’m sleepy.” Addison closed her eyes a little, all the action making her lose what little energy she had left. “Can you take me upstairs?”
The proud Pharisee in his prayer found no blessing, but the lowly publican went away with heart and hand full of heaven’s divinest gifts.
Ooh ooh ooh, another cool thing happened this week. I actually made money from the blog! It only took six years. (I'm banned from Google for life because of a mistake Serge made when he put google ads on his site and started clicking the ads. Apparently, this is like murder and you can never be forgiven for not reading the fine print/understanding the concept) Yeah, I got a few bucks for putting a link on this post. Cool huh?
Today, the west is in the crisis and India is looking unstoppable despite its slums and poverty, and they are losing their businesses to us. What an opportunity to paint India as the Slumdog Millionaire? The film is nothing but an endorsement of an erstwhile imperial mindset of the West and its blinkered vision of India.
One day, as the young man passed the old lady's stand
Cialis would be the latest innovation by simply pharmaceutical and pill manufacturers Lilly Icos. Cialis is the primary tablet for erectile dysfunction (ED) that gives anyone up to 36 hours to plan out the moment that’s right for you and your companion.
That late and sleepless morn
Anyway, when you take away all the blogs that aren't really about advertising, we're way higher up than we have any right to be. Especially after yesterday's dumb-ass post about politics.
Points to the 2 identical islands ahead.
I was kinda hard-up and it was one of the few movies available I had even a sliver of interest in seeing. I didn’t have high hopes it would be good. In fact, I was pretty sure it would be laughably bad. So you could have knocked me over with a feather when I found myself paying close attention to the film. Well, as close as I could with a baby toddling around.
Okay guys; here's the sheezee:
Business enterprise so that you can business enterprise pay for plus profits with ad providers make pleasing site to get corporation reason. A unbelievable piece of equipment to get compact and significant home-business, to set plus help you save in a variety of personality internet. It gives you its company an awesome method to many of the producers’ vendors plus exporters in the a very similar business enterprise so that you can disseminate and another type of personality.
toward the
Rev 19:7 Let us be glad and rejoice, and give honor to Him: for the marriage of the Lamb is come, and His wife has made herself ready.
Making Amends for This Year.
I was briefly a member of the Communist Party myself, back in my circus days. They made me take lessons in Marxist theory as part of my induction, which is when I got expelled for “reactionary and bourgeois attitudes”. I then got added to their list of enemies, which made me somewhat uncomfortable.
crashing of the worship
like poetry, creative writing, or journalism
Brides-to-be, want your cake to convey a sense of elegance in addition to the fun, campy style normally reserved for peanut vendors and clown cars? Then have I got the cake for you!
I headed to my craft table with Route44 in tow and started crafting! I embellished with supplies I had on hand! It was super easy! I had so much fun!
I’m really curious about your thoughts on this post in particular. Do you watch book trailers? Do they have any affect on whether you buy a book or not?
We had a nice, relaxing Saturday. We did nothing. Hehehe. OK, so we did a few things around the house. My backyard now looks MUCH better since Captain America mowed and raked it. If you saw it when we first moved in, you'd say it looks FABULOUS! But it was nice to spend the day lounging around the house. Lounging is good.
Perjury, to be clear, is, in the law of Scotland, the making of false statements under oath, the statements having to be competent evidence in the case in which they were made, and material to the subject of the case or investigation. There requires to be proof beyond reasonable doubt that the statement or statements are false and that they are made wilfully and there requires to be evidence from at least two sources.
The investigation will be progressed expeditiously and in close liaison with the Area Procurator Fiscal and Crown Counsel. Significant resources will be deployed though these will vary with the needs of the investigation.
The joy of long exposure is the way in which moving elements either disappear (they don’t stay long enough in one place for the light they reflect to register on the sensor) or, if repetitive or slow moving, become blurred. Here, while the beach and the mountains behind are static and remain relatively sharp (sadly the gusting wind meant that a little fuzziness crept in to the frame), you can see that the clouds have streaked into long wispy things, and the sea has mellowed out into a soupy azure mist.
Cold Opening – A Message from the President of the United States
“No. Penelope is the lead role Princess Penelope and the Seven Stars.” It’s the play we’ve chosen for our end-of-year party.”
“No you didn’t,” I protest. “I didn’t even have a drink here last night!” But it is no good, he is convinced that he ejected me the night before and there appears to be nothing I can do to convince him it wasn’t me.
Unfortunately, as in most cases, the initial focus and research is just on the street-level policing. More research will have to be done to determine if all elements of the Philippine justice system have built their capacity to decrease or eradicate trafficking.
6) Matt banter with ”Congratulations-man…” in the crowd
Ahh, there is a good fascist on the march if ever there was one. Congratulations. The out cry from the public? Drowned out by the buzz of mosquitoes.
lets jsut see how this all goes :)
Okay, let's get started!
I have been on the side lines of a few conversations over the years that have led me to say (sometimes out loud, sometimes just to myself) "That would be me. I am that mother".
That kind of thinking is regessive to an earlier period of human development when words had magic and could cause events all by themselves.
The trail is pretty uneventful. It wanders through moist areas where creeks cross (or are part of) the trail, and up through drier, piney ridges as well. From Abrams Creek campground up to Cane Gap the trail is interspersed with short rises and flat spots. Despite the heat of the day it was fairly cool (but quite humid) along the trail. Along the way we stopped at Campsite #1 where we stayed last year for Duncan's first backpacking trip.
General Azazi questioned the logic of a party constitution that seemingly closed the door on President Goodluck Jonathan, when in fact the constitution which made him president clearly said: ‘hey man, you can run’.
1978
and which the sadist, I'm not sure,
No, I do not think the blow to James Harden’s head knocks them down on this list at all. I am hopeful that he is going to bounce back just fine from the injury. However, OKC has other issues. Russell Westbrook is playing just poorly enough recently to make us all think that he might not be the best partner to pair with Kevin Durant again. In the month of April, Westbrook is shooting 38% from the floor. In the last five games he is 25-82 (30.5%) from the floor. Not exactly the numbers you want to see from your second option, especially when his shot selection indicates a first option mentality. Having said all of that, the Thunder have maybe the most talented roster top to bottom. They certainly have grown over the past couple years. Something just tells me that they are still a year away from knocking down the next two teams on our list…
Pimms
You can get so confused that you’ll start in to race down long wiggled roads at a break-necking pace and grind on for miles across weirdish wild space, headed, I fear, toward a most useless place.
3. Dip the pieces of fish in the flour.
There is no planning involved in this process. She is purely a product of me sitting in front of a screen typing what comes to mind until it all tangles together and makes sense. While I enjoy the process, I am currently feeling that vague sense of terror. Like I’m standing on the edge of a canyon and the rocks beneath my feet are going to give way at any second.
My heart won’t move, it’s incomplete–today, yes. My heart won’t move away from this place of feeling incomplete. It never did move. How could it? My heart was formed in your belly and from your DNA and your genes. How do you think my heart would move away from that? And, how do you think it would ever be complete without knowing it’s origin.
198) beautiful new friends and beautiful worship music playing at K's craft class today
Bake for 25-30 minutes or until puffy and golden brown.
So yeah... I woke up after a bad nights rest. Sick. Tired. Not sleeping well. Afraid to sleep too soundly for fear of throwing up. I didn't, so that was good at least. But I did eventually wake up.
In 1951 Woody was tapped to be the 19th coach of Ohio State. The next years would bring success not like anyone had ever dreamed of. It wasn’t until 1954 that the first of the successful years began with a perfect season of 10 and 0 with a trip to the Rose Bowl. Sure there were ups and downs in any program but Coach was able to keep proving himself. I was a glint in my parents eye and have learned a lot of history by what I have read doing research for this piece.
He voiced hope that the “many refugees” currently in need of humanitarian assistance “find the acceptance and solidarity capable of relieving their dreadful sufferings”.
Each of the small towns had a large church. Sometimes somewhat incongruous in its grandness in a very humble setting, but still a moving testament to the piety of the original white settlers. Found a town. Build a church.
Whiteford, A & Van Seventer, D. (1999). Winners and Losers: South Africa's changing income distribution in the 1990s. WEFA Southern Africa, www.wefa.co.za.
As our tour guide was telling us this portion of the story, my mind wandered a bit and I wondered…If someone came to my house 1,000 years from now and, for some reason, there were still discernible artifacts among the rubble, what would people find? And maybe more important, what would they think of me because of what they found? Admittedly, I don’t have a bunch of amazing things in my home, but it really is the more day to day “stuff” that tells people how you lived. Books, music, family photos, computers, kitchen tools…what would my “stuff” say about me? What would they think was important to me?
"This need go no further." He leans into her, "It could be worse Corina. If they found out you've come here or reported this to the police...it could be much worse."
Fenugreek is frequently used in the production of flavoring for artificial maple syrups. The taste of toasted fenugreek, like cumin, is additionally based on substituted pyrazines. By itself, fenugreek has a bitter taste.
As I mentioned to briefly in last post I actually sat in one of those plastic one piece lawn chairs. At the circus you could “upgrade” your ticket for $2 and get ring side. I sat in the bleachers for a long while and saw an empty chair right in the front row… just under the 300 pound mark I decided on courage instead of fear. During the show I was concerned as it wasn’t feeling totally rock stable but it held with no crack or bang or anything.
We need help
Allow muffins to cool on a wire rack for five minutes before removing from pan to continue cooling.
I have managed to do some scrapping :)
They heard about Simon on the news and contacted me about featuring her as the Pet of the Day.
2 cups semi-sweet chocolate chunks (or chips)
Shankar had fallen asleep, but he woke up very suddenly. By now the moon was in the middle sky, and everything was clearly visible in the pale moonlight. The fire had died. Coolies were asleep. Everything was quiet.
And I woke up in the cruising community—and we had rides to shore, and offers of loner dinghies, and suggested ideas, and a lead on a dinghy that belonged to another Canadian cruising family who was done their trip and ready to trade a dinghy for a car. And the dinghy had the exact motor on it that we planned to eventually buy and it was only one year old, and the dinghy was also fairly new and in good shape. So we rented a ute and went to meet our new dinghy—and its family, SV Monkey Feet. And a deal was struck and Monkey Feet was happy to see
Celebration of color?! Definitely. Not necessarily in a different way than Illamasqua has done until now, but it certainly has this early "90's revisited" vibe to it.
I pray for others with transcendent faith.
Most of you who live on the other side of the Atlantic just said, yeah, that’s James Elroy Flecker, famous guy, quoted all over the place, where have you been? Clearly, I’ve been on this side of the Atlantic, though that’s probably not much of an excuse, considering how badly I’ve hidden my Anglophilia.**
Incidentally, I haven’t secured a translator yet. When I do, I’ll write more about how I made all that work (because my goal is to accomplish what I want to accomplish without investing money…or, at least, much money. You have to be creative when you’re only making $30 a month!!) It looks promising.
ghosts whisper
11:45 - 12:10: Switch classes, other class does bellwork
This seems like simple common sense to me, but when you get sick, sometimes that just goes right out the window. I’m not proud of it, but I clearly remember leaving screaming messages on a former nephrologist’s answering machine when he would not call me back about surgery I was having in just two days. (I finally had the surgeon call him.) Yes, he was an incredibly arrogant person who had no respect for me, but did it help that I treated him – shall we say – less than respectfully, too? Answer: Nope, it just helped my self- respect fly out the window.
U.S. Export Controls
P.S. If any Dancer’s Ranch people see this, please keep in mind it is a reflection of personal opinion and also is four-and-a-half years old. I make no claim about how the place is run currently.
Once bound now free.
Looking for a good Gothic tale?
Cut off the top quarter of the bell peppers, remove seeds.
Each winner will have 48 hours to reply to the email to claim their prize otherwise a new winner will be chosen for that prize.
(Baby Wolf coos.)
The immediate pain will eventually fade. Just as when my father died, there was terrible pain for me. I wanted to pick up the phone and call him, but I knew I couldn’t. I wanted one last time, for old times’ sake, but I couldn’t. I flashed back to all the good times, but they were not to be any more. I believe that feeling may be something similar you must experience to live on. Your old life must die and there will be tremendous pain with that death. Each day you will want, just one more time. Time may heal all wounds but sometimes the scars are there forever.
Then his body language signaled to her that "something bad was about to happen."
and you get this...
Whoa! Better read on.
So Adrian finished up where he could and as we were waiting for the rain to cease (again I know!) he packed up and set off to his next job. We let him go knowing that we might not be able to get him back should we need him but that’s the risk we are having to take. He wasn’t able to move forward at the pace he was used to as we needed to pause and wait for the electrics to get done and they would be at least another week and well you can’t pay someone to have time to wait .
What I’m trying to say here is that Colin Harvey knew the steps. He knew how to dance.
having more to complain about rather than to appreciate will not do any good at all.
Strength: Royce White is one of the best all-around players in the nation. Not many talk about him, but he can score, pass, and rebound with the best of them. Head Coach Fred Hoiberg has done an excellent job of surrounding him with talented players leading to a suprising season. White is largely responsible and he is going to be a nightmare to matchup with in the Big Dance.
And David said, Is there yet any that is left of the house of Saul, that I may shew him kindness for Jonathan’s sake? And there was of the house of Saul a servant whose name was Ziba. And when they had called him unto David, the king said unto him, Art thou Ziba? And he said, Thy servant is he.
Families
My card I think is pretty
But let’s back up a bit to November 3 last year, when two-year-old Sukhraj Singh and his three-year-old cousin, Achilles Memphis Rein Kaui, were found floating face-down in the Taruheru River, near Atkinson Park Reserve in Gisborne.
The people of Seville gathered on the banks of the Guadalquivir to view the sad spectacle of their beloved sovereign, the Poet-King Al Mu'tamid and his family being taken into exile...
Hurry, hurry....SAG CONTRACT
* Microsoft Office skills required
One idea is simple and it can be done with whatever leftovers you have. Make your own TV dinners. Simply freeze individual portions of your leftovers and have them ready for a quick lunch or dinner for one.
But yet when she had her precious little Sammy, it was if no other woman in the world had ever had a baby but her. Elkanah cooing over her, well it just made me sick.
Following Wise Men (working title)
Another natural aspect can be added to the flight sim cockpit is the vibrations and the sense of movement.
Some of the treats left by Fairy Godparents (secret pals) went missing. How did the unschooling community respond? They came up with replacement treats and reminded each other that people who take are needy people.
'Storm Warning' (second collection) was the adult title chosen for the Bridport Big Read this year (thank you!) and it was great to answer a question about mining – added to The Coward’s Tale – it does make me seem a bit of a nerd – o soddit. I am a nerd. Official.
I have been watching The Voice ever since the beginning of last season. We are now in the semi-finals of season two. For those who don’t watch it, the show has a really cool concept. At the beginning when each artists sing for the four mentors/ team leaders (Adam Levine, Christina Aguilera, Cee Lo Green and Blake Shelton) the four can’t see what they look like! This way, the artists are only being picked by their vocal ability and not on how they look. This season each team had 12 artists on it, and now they are down to the final two on each team. The mentors will give each artist a rating and everyone can vote from home (online, by phone or by buying the songs on itunes) and tomorrow night they will announce which one person from each team will go to the finals next week. When the winner is announced, they get a record deal and the title of The Voice.
Popular culture has a long history of stirring up concerns and triggering the response of attempted
Envy was on full display at the topless pool, also in terms of ordering the most bottle service, being the most sexually provocative in the pool, and doing the most outlandish poses poolside. I wondered how the security staff and lifeguards of this pool (all of three feet deep at the deep end) must feel after working this post after a while. I think I’d go nuts. I couldn’t do it. The fact that people work in this sort of atmosphere day in and day out for months and years on end reveals how divorced we have become (as a generalization about modern people) from our divine heritage, or simply from the spirituality behind our sexuality. There is nothing but base, exagerrated, ego-driven displays of tawdriness here. I am sure I could catch some flack for this, but I don’t find it sexy at all.
high ass
impeccable literary and media counter culture taste.
It feels wonderful when you find the right word, but more importantly, it reads better.
It was time to sell myself for a while?
Fires Were Started
Thanks for the vent.
The same kind of propaganda found in Nazi antisemitic literature makes a return in "An Education" but at a more subtle level. This is how a negative political ideology works: it takes a group and dehumanises them by substituting negative characteristics for their essential humanity. Whatever goes wrong it is they who did it and people can retaliate without conscience because they do not share our humanity.
“It is based on moral and physical means different from those upon which orthodox military techniques are based on. Its purpose is: (a) To destroy the will and the fighting spirit of the enemy and avoid its allies’ support and, (b) To encourage our troops and our allies’ will of being victorious.”
China
Ranking the countries I visited for beer:
Franky, you’ve got more to you than this. I don’t want to see you back here ever again. You’re a good kid, now act like it.
Shipula admits that, finally, after throwing smoke. He says all he wants is a level playing field. But that's not going to happen with the maze-like provisions of the Pennsylvania Liquor Code, where the MBDAPA apparently found reason to argue that if Sheetz doesn't want to sell on-premise, they can't sell off-premise. This ignores Appleby's, of course, which does sell on-premise but chooses not to sell off-premise, as do many, if not the majority of Pennsylvania's restaurants with liquor licenses.
Prior to heading out to Chicago, I'd read other stories of the surgery - particularly Trisha's and Jaded's - and had very specific ideas about what to expect. None of them truly prepared me for the excruciating pain. I don't think that it's possible to really wrap your head around it unless you're actually experiencing it. I was also expecting a ton of waiting and it to be loud and busy and crazy, but since I was the first surgery of the day, it was the opposite. Yes, we had to check in at 6am, which meant waking up at 5am, but it was well worth it. We didn't have to really wait at all, and everything proceeded on time. Highly recommended to get that slot if you can swing it.
This recipe is a good example of this type of harmony. I read a recipe for orange glazed fish and thought it would make a great Extreme Vegan Makeover. It combines my love for spicy Cajun seasoning with Tom’s love of sweet, fruity marmalade. I don’t usually like foods that are glazed but here the spice and sweet are a marriage made in heaven.
I wonder if true change can ever be forced??
Roundup: 6 books read total, 3 reread, 1 sort of abandoned. Click the titles below for my full reviews or reading notes. My rating scale is explained here.
How is it that despite being surprised, taken aback, confused and slightly triggered, some part of me is pleased by these ‘friendly’ gestures?
I LOVE to cook painfully hard recipes
“I’d give anything to hear her say that,” he said boldly.
Preheat about 3" of oil in a pot – making sure not to add oil more than halfway up the pot. Heat the oil to 340F (the croquettes fry too quickly at higher temperatures). Fry a few croquettes at a time until they are golden brown – making sure not to overcrowd the oil. Drain on paper towels. Sprinkle with salt and serve piping hot with your favorite dipping sauce.
” I believed he was wrong. I spent the next 20 years working through the evidence to prove lt.”
Geez, how old is Sythe? Pity he lived before the twenty-four hour news cycle...
But enough about the weather. I will now relate bits of life.
The RTA officer told Bob that 5 inspectors had been dispatched to the North and the West of the state to target the buses heading to Canberra for the COOEE March.
I had the pleasure of attending day one of Mercedes-Benz Fashion Week Australia including Gail Sorronda’s show ‘Oh My Goth!’. Her show featured colorful high waisted pant pieces and almost clown like polka dot dresses. The backdrop was a stunning film made by emerging Australian film maker Nick Waterman which added a deep moodiness to the showcase.
CAN THESE BONES LIVE?
All topped with undisturbed sleep until fairly late this morning… and immediately gifted with cinnamon rolls and coffee when I finally did get up and dressed.
What You Can Win:
A few updates:
No tea was involved.
I also don't want to hear about the strong "loyalties" of soldiers, sailors and airmen allegedly of the Muslim faith.
All cooked vegetables and boiled eggs.
They decided it best to tear it down, lest it be a lasting shame to them that the Gentiles had defiled it; so they tore down the altar.
Since George Zimmerman is being charged with second-degree murder in Florida, it will be helpful to understand all the aspects of Florida’s legal definition of second-degree murder, which you can read here.
When you coupon, you often have to get more than you need. A deal might consist of buy one get one free or a coupon may say that you have to buy a certain amount to get the money off. I do have a little stock pile, but we don't need or have the room for too much. Because of this, I've collected a little pile of stuff that I wanted to donate but didn't know where to donate it. Then a few weeks ago, they announced at church that The Baptist Children's Home was having their annual food/supply round up. I took my little donate pile to church. Over the weekend, I decided to buy a few more things to donate to The Baptist Children's Home.
Talk of Robber Barons and Monopolies is anti-free market rhetoric cooked up by leftists who hate capitalism
The TSP survey this week fell to an even more bearish posture with 59% expecting lower prices and just 31% expecting higher ones. The bull ratio declined to 34%, the lowest since August 2010.
I hope you have enjoyed my 62nd installment of My Crafty Picks and have found some inspiration and/or joy!! This is something I do each Sunday so make sure you check back often!! And don't forget to visit these lovely artists blog and let them know that they were featured here on My Crafty Picks!!
And before I go on and let this whole motha rip, let me clarify a few more points.
She pulled her eyebrow tweezers out of her make up bag and attacked her friend, who bled to death.
(and for equal opportunity)
Until now, that is. So there you go.
Writing courses have been helpful to me because I’ve learned more about craft. I also have benefitted from valuable feedback and learned what works and doesn’t by reading others’ work in critique groups. Learning how to give and receive constructive criticism is invaluable. The creative process is often so personal, it takes effort and practice to separate the written work from yourself.
Where have all the graveyards gone, long time passing?
Said an embarrassed looking Shag.
And as I rested my phone back in the receiver and wiped away the 5th smudge of tomato sauce from my paper, that little fighting soldier inside me? The one that wants to stick up for myself? Explain myself? Set the record straight? Well, she got a bit pissed.
I pushed through the bushes after Sophie. Sophie??? The thought froze me solid in the middle of the bush; did I really think the large feline that had crawled through these bushes minutes ago was the same cat that had been mine as a child? The same Sophie who had slept curled on my bed every night until...I....left? Is that how I had come to be in this place? I started to move forward again, if I stopped to ponder these strange thoughts, I would lose track of Sophie.
The next time you are washing your hands and complain because the water temperature isn't just how you like it, think about how things used to be. Here are some facts about the 1500's:
Some reach it earlier than others. Some never reach it. As one who is still learning much about the world, I can say I like who I am, even love myself. Despite growing wobbly in the face of life challenges, the core of my being holds fast and true to who I am ethically and how I conduct myself in the world. Hopefully, the memories I leave will be largely of kindness and grace.
freesia) in home fragrance, but in springtime, I often crave a
I have a few more things to finish up....like some barn doors....then I'll show you a bit more.
I remember walking in the fields of ripe sugar cane with dad and watching with awe the making of jaggery and fresh molasses. The taste of soft fresh jaggery and rab (molasses) is unforgettable. He took me to see how the oil was extracted from mustard seeds. In the middle of a room there used to be a Kolhu. At the bottom, it had a hole to collect oil. It the middle it had a very heavy wooden rod. The rod pressed the mustard seeds against the wall of the Kolhu. This rod was linked by another piece of wood placed on the neck of a bull. As the bull went around in circle, the seeds were pressed to extract oil. After the oil was extracted, the empty cake of mustard seeds was mixed with the feed for dairy cows or water buffalos. For a six-year-old it was nothing short of a visit to wonderland. We would walk among the fields of gold (the yellow flowing mustard fields) and come across a rahaat or water wheel (Persian wheel) powered by a buffalo or a bull. The cold clear water would bring the village kids to bathe and play there. Sometimes the farmers or weary travelers would sit there to rest on charpais (wooden cots weaved with ropes) placed under shady trees.
Finally, my favorite upgrade/new addition to our
I almost guarantee that not every single Ephesian had abandoned their first love, but Christ did not single out individuals in this letter. It is addressed to the church in Ephesus, and it calls for all to repent and change their ways. This passage made me wonder about collective responsibility within a community. If an individual within a church knows of some corruption or wrongdoing within the establishment and does nothing about it, does not confront in brotherly love, just lets it slide, are they just as responsible as the person or people “in the wrong?” I’m not sure I want to know the answer to this question either.
Own we’re lovers
Goodreads description:
I turned up on the first day in full school uniform, one of only two boys wearing a cap. The other was called Cheeseman. I was assigned to the same class as Cheeseman and sat next to him as the seating plan was alphabetical. Two little boys with two little caps. It breaks my heart to think of the naivety of it and the potential for piss-taking. But this was a nice school. Bullies were few and far between and didn't pick on me for some time. I settled into certain classes with ease. English, maths and French. Everything else, I hated.
__________________________________________________
For it has to be admitted: the stewed prune was conscripted by the regiment of women who knew “what's best for you” and had seized on the bowel as their territory. These enforcers– the nurse, the nanny, the sports mistress, the hair-netted dinner lady – took charge of your insides with a noxious mix of no-nonsense affect and shaming euphemism. Accompanied by the whiff of disinfectant, brusque insinuations of “regularity” and “movements” turned the poor prune into a purgative.
Such problem has also been seen in people who do not take Cialis; therefore the authenticity is actually yet to be proved. At any rate if it occurs speak to your doctor as soon as possible.
Of course now its deemed legal, teams can either formally protest it or adopt it themselves. Doing the the latter is possible for most teams, as they have apertures in the footwell area to fit a snorkel, while the shark fin and rear wing are easily created. But, finding a route for the duct out of the tub might prove the headache, as the monocoque may not have any openings sufficiently large enough. This year the monocoque is also is subject to homologation and hence cannot be altered until the 2011 season. Of course ‘where there’s a will, there’s a way’, teams will not want to lose a straight line speed advantage.
Hope you enjoyed the list.I thought I’d leave you with a synopsis of An Unexpected Bride. Enjoy.
The daughter that was gone the longest, lives on the other side of the US from her mother. It doesn't surprise me in the least. There was an irreconcilable divide that happened, in a large part because of the mother's inability to see outside of herself and to look deeply into her children.
He was nailed to a cross between two thieves
Commander, Air Education and Training Command, (‘01-’05)
Both my son and I have worked as “trouble-shooters” for electronics equipment. So last night, after watching yet another news report about the strange problems plaguing Toyota automobiles, we got into a discussion about how difficult it is to solve problems that are hard to re-create. This in turn, reminded me of a TV documentary I’d seen about the problems that plagued the de Havilland Comet Airliner. You need to take a quick look at that page in order for the rest of this post to make sense.
Goodbye for now
and you know what that means…
Evangeline
don’t forget a single blessing!
start-ups, food makers and light industrial manufacturers," hopefully employing 400-500 people in a couple of years. (no word on how much local hiring is in the works). Additionally, Butler and his partners (who include Goldman Sachs and the guys who brought you the Toren) plan to set aside some space for good times. Writes the Journal, "one section of the property will be used for cultural events and another section will have a food and beer hall that will feature food vendors from the Brooklyn Flea, a flea market held on weekends in Fort Greene and Williamsburg. Mr. Butler envisions that the 9,000-square-foot food hall will have five or six different food vendors."
It’s important that we keep the momentum going and we pass this bill this year. So we need all of your help. Everyone out there needs to focus on this. This is doable. It’s right there. But we’ve got to make it happen.
So basically the US site is a single-minded drill-down system that lets you instead look at "all recordings" at any point, whereas the EU site thinks you might prefer "all recordings" but gives you a cumbersome option of using the drill-down system. In other words ArkivMusic has decided to partially hide its USP in favour of something that looks much clunkier than most of its competitors.
A music producer is going to work with the basics and the better the foundation or piece of meat, the more options and the better the end result will be.
6. Been in love? - I'm in love now and highly recommend it.
Being the supportive wife I sometimes am if I'm offered a decent enough bribe, I very grudgingly agreed and cancelled the rest of my plans for the day.
Hello.
And today, as I brainstormed with a student on how he could get new shoes (he's homeless and his are falling apart), he told me that what I do for my students is "inspiring."
On the awards for his birthday, he said that no more than 40 Datukships would be given each year, except during special occasions, adding that “if too many are given out, it would lose its prestige”.
Japanese knotweed is at its tastiest when it's just begun to sprout and is still flexible at a stage where it's called "wild rhubarb" (in Vermont, early to mid May), otherwise the stalks become woody as they grow taller. And by snipping the early stalks before they go to flower and spread their seed you do the landscape, and your belly, a huge service.
How can I educate myself to do something new, if everyone around me is doing the same thing?
In fact, Richard Brodhead made no statement, of any kind, about the case on March 22; and he never claimed, one way or the other, to possess knowledge on who did or did not attend the party.
The country has been on fire all week in several ways, but the most important issue has been Cheryl Miller. A woman whose story affected many because it hit home just how vulnerable we are to the whims and fancy of any state body that wishes to abuse its power. The ease with which Cheryl Miller was locked up, the ease with which her family were denied their right to their own kin, the ease with which the authorities justified their actions and the ease with which they are now twisting the story away from their abuse of rights and inability to follow protocol and instead making it about whether Cheryl Miller is mentally ill or not is not just disgusting, it is downright scary.
To keep costs down a little bit, rather than printing "the matt osborne band" in white, we just left the "mirror" of the CD exposed (that's why the words and the perimeter have that rainbow effect).
So, can someone tell me what exactly it is that Dark Star, Thornbridge, Lovibonds, Meantime, Harvey's, Fuller's, Adnams, Sharp's, St Austell, Harviestoun, Marble, Moorhouse's, Otley, Breconshire, Rooster's, Kelham Island, Lancaster and countless others are doing then?
I walked out of the metro, smile-on-face, whistling, actually WHISTLING, my way to the job I have come to loathe when: Someones bowels exploded. No, no. I'm serious. EX. PLO. DED. Wouldn't at all be surprised if bits of his innards were mixed in there.
But when I was 16, and sir asked me where I'd be tanning, I began to notice how many of my classmates were glowing.
Where I drown here, underneath these existential waves
I try to remind myself that I’m still healing and I need time and rest and safety and security.
That's what I was told, and I'd love to know if it's the truth! I care very much because St. Wenceslaus is my name saint. Have you heard this before?
Henry Thomas—who often recorded under the name “Ragtime Texas” was born in 1874 in Big Sandy, Texas. Given Thomas’ age, we can be pretty sure that he was around to witness the development of the blues from whatever its ultimate sources were, & he is often referred to as a “songster,” meaning that he didn’t specialize in blues, but played in a number of genres. Of course, that’s deceptive, because there’s strong evidence that many early musicians who we think of as playing blues exclusively also played widely in other genres too, but when it came time to record, they were mostly encouraged to draw from their blues repertoire.
Ad came up with a good song last night. A lyric and some chords and a bass riff. That's what it takes. 15 minutes later we've got a stomping classic Magic Ship song on our hands. Oi!
After a farewell American tour they dissolved in May 1971.
Of my whole course of wooing, thou cried’st “Indeed?”
Terms used to describe vegetarians and their diets
Yesterday, it was our small groups turn to bring treats for our Women's Bible Study at church and I thought these pumpkin cookies would be perfect for the season. (This is one Drew's favorite cookies.)
You want a one-sentence summary that immediately gives
Now in verse 32 our story continues. “Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off.” They foiled the plan of the shipmen having believed the words of Paul, “Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved.” It was a drastic measure, cutting away the only lifeboat, but the centurion believed the words of Paul.
PB: Of course. You’re a sadist.
Until this last week when TACOM (Tank and Automotive Command) sends out a message that "Polymer Magazines are not authorized for use on the M4/M16 series rifle" and I kid you not I read the message myself. I couldn't believe it, so I looked up the TACOM manual for the M4/M16 and sure enough the PMag is not listed as an authorized accessory. But then again neither is a "ghetto grip" or "grip pod" or "bipod."
Have you ever taken a closet inventory and wanted to scream? Not your spiritual closet, let’s not go that deep just yet. I’m talking about your clothes closet. While helping a client recently, I could see how she felt tied to her past. The longer we worked on getting her closet organized, the more I came to realize that she was deeply attached to her stuff. God revealed to me that the reason for her sadness was due to her recent downsizing. She hadn’t fully accepted that her new home was not as grand and spacious as before. She seemed desperate to go back to what she felt was better times. I saw in her the same common denominator among many who have too much stuff. She couldn’t get excited about her new closet, because she was stuck trying to hold on to the past. So it is with many Christian women who can’t get excited about what God is doing right now and in the future; they are too consumed with the past.
Note the hybrid power plant also recovers some of the kinetic energy of the vehicle, by letting this KE drive an electrical generator (during braking). The electrical energy is stored in the batteries. (Normally, this KE is dissipated as heat in the brakes.) An inverter is used to convert DC electricity from the batteries to AC electricity needed by the electric motor and created by the generator.
However, agents are difficult to acquire. They seek celebrities, professional experts, and those with an established platform or proven track record. A first time author with little or no background experience will have a tough time finding an agent.
The first step is to be sure you invest before you make a withdrawal. By this we mean, don’t just jump in with both feet and start asking for commitments. Remember, the point of social media is relationships, so a far better tactic is to start getting involved by establishing yourself as a resource.
In all his public life, through the preaching of the Gospel and miraculous signs, Jesus proclaimed the goodness and mercy of the Father towards man. This mission reached its culmination on Golgotha, where the crucified Christ revealed the face of God, so that man, contemplating the Cross, might be able to recognize the fullness of love. The sacrifice of Calvary is mysteriously anticipated in the Last Supper, when Jesus, sharing with the Twelve the bread and wine, transforms them into his body and his blood, which shortly after he would offer as immolated Lamb. The Eucharist is the memorial of the Death and Resurrection of Jesus Christ, of his love to the end for each one of us, memorial that He willed to entrust to the Church so that it would be celebrated throughout the centuries. According to the meaning of the Hebrew word “zakar,” the “memorial” is not simply the memory of something that happened in the past, but a celebration which actualizes that event, so as to reproduce its salvific force and efficacy. Thus, “the sacrifice that Christ offered to the Father, once and for all, on the Cross in favor of humanity, is rendered present and actual” (Compendium of the Catechism of the Catholic Church, No. 280). Dear brothers and sisters, in our time the word sacrifice is not liked, rather it seems to belong to other times and to another way of understanding life. However, properly understood, it is and remains fundamental, because it reveals to us with what love God loves us in Christ….
Okay I know, manipulatives can be a pain! Having to pull them out and sort it before the lesson, training the students how to use them, and then clean up. It seems like it's so not worth the hassle when you look at the picture in front of you. However, if you were to look at the big picture, manipulatives are a key asset to any true comprehension in math.
Dawn took up the challenge by using part of a box her hubbys new shirt came in! The card, the image & ticket were printed on scraps from her scrap box & has a dp printed on the other side! The beanstalk layer was once part of a room spray box, and the button was recycled from a jacket. Well done Dawn! This card looks amazing!
China is vast country with 23 provinces and more than 1 billion people of various races and religions.
SEPTEMBER: Suave and compromising. Careful, cautious and organized. Likes to point out people’s mistakes. Likes to criticize. Stubborn. Quiet but able to talk well. Calm and cool. Kind and sympathetic. Concerned and detailed. Loyal but not always honest. Does work well. Very confident. Sensitive. Good memory. Clever and knowledgeable. Loves to look for information. Must control oneself when criticizing. Able to motivate oneself. Understanding. Fun to be around. Secretive. Loves leisure and traveling. Hardly shows emotions. Tends to bottle up feelings. Very choosy, especially in relationships. Systematic.
What day of the seventh month is the Day of Atonement? (The Day of Atonement is to be celebrated on the tenth day of the seventh month. v. 26)
Certainly people in the S and M community know that the threshold between physical pain and sexual pleasure is finite. The closer one gets to that threshold the more blurred the line becomes and the less one cares where it is. I have learned this last week that the same applies to emotional pain and erotic pleasure. Sex has been off the table for me for many days since this tragedy in our family. A hiatus of weeks with no mmo and no partner sex is very unusual for me. But in all fairness I wasn’t in the mood. But there was a turn of events that set the stage for J and I to seek the solace of sharing sexual passion as a means to try and put the world sight and seek ways to strengthen our relationship to get through this time.
Most scientists believe Earth collided with a hypothetical, Mars-sized planet called Theia early in its existence, and the resulting smash-up produced a disc of magma orbiting our planet that later coalesced to form the moon. This is called the giant impact hypothesis. Computer models indicate that, for the collision to remain consistent with the laws of physics, at least 40% of the magma would have had to come from Theia.
(The photo attached is taken in central Turkey, Cappadocia and that opening reminds me the shape of an EAR! a good listening ear!)
Term: Contract
- easy to use
You can view Matheny’s job in a similar way to how you may view the job of whatever poor guy gets stuck playing shortstop for the Yankees once Jeter retires. The shoes Matheny needs to fill are ones that Shaq would have a hard time filling. Tony La Russa’s managerial career in St. Louis spanned sixteen years and owns a total 1408-1182 record in those years, giving him a winning percentage of .544. La Russa is the longest tenured manager in Cardinals history and his retirement ultimately ended an era of greatness in St. Louis.
Miss Peregrine's Home for Peculiar Children by Ransom Riggs
First, as the city’s congressman for all but two of the last 20 years, he has compiled an impressive record on issues relating to civil rights and civil liberties for all Americans, refusing to tolerate a system in which people are treated differently because of their race, class, or gender.
My day began early, awaking around 6 am in order to leave by 7 for an appointment at the Honda dealer to get the car serviced. I drive an hour to the best Honda service place around, and it’s worth it. I’ve said before that I have one that’s 20 minutes away, but I don’t like them, I don’t trust them, and after two chances at having me as a customer, they had an epic fail and I was done with them.
I read her words whilst waiting for the disastrous private appointment I had on Monday. “We can never escape the pain of our pasts, or the flashbacks that assault us when we dare to let our thoughts drift unattended, but we can choose to not let it ruin the future we, alone, can build for ourselves,” Kenyon writes. I am taking those words very much to heart.
Boil the sugar and water togther for the sugar syrup for 10-15 mins on low heat.Turn off the heat.Add cardomon pwd,saffaron and rose water.
WE ARE COMING HOME!!!!!
for our brothers and sisters who are sick;
Nominating runs until January 25th at midnight EST.
I know the accident, losing Mom, made everyone sad for such a long time. Pops did his best to try to make things as normal as he could without Mom there. He made our lunches with us at night, letting us pick out what we wanted, just like she used to do. He did everything he could to keep things the same as possible, always trying to be happy… but every now and then Jack or I would walk past his room and hear him sobbing. At first, it really scared Jack, but Uncle Oud sat down with us one afternoon before Pops came home and explained, ‘You know how you really miss your Mom, well, your Pops really misses her too. Sometimes, when you’re the Pops, you just have to go in your room and miss her. Sometimes when things remind him of her, or her laugh, or when one of their favorite songs plays on the radio… He misses her a lot and just needs to take some time by himself, just like you do. And it’s always okay to miss someone when they are not here anymore.’ Uncle Howard had stayed with us for almost six months after he got out of the hospital. Pops said he needed family around to help him get better. They had even brought in the special bed for him, like the ones at the hospital, like the one Jack was sleeping in tonight. It all seemed so normal for Uncle Howard to stay with us; after all, he was there almost every day before the accident. He would stop by after work to see his ‘big sis’ or he would bring steaks for Pops to cook on the grill and corn and we would all have a picnic in the back yard for dinner.
And in this process, enlightenment happens. I’ve got some clearer ideas as to how I’ll proceed when the rain stops and I’m out again. I have a vision for the next buildings.
The bottom shelf was painted black, ready to stencil some white words on...
Place the butter, brown sugar, corn syrup or maple syrup, vinegar and vanilla extract into the bowl of a food processor and process until well combined. Add the eggs and continue to process until well mixed and smooth.
By opting to REMOVE all rights to negative freedoms like porn or red light districts from all other Americans, what you get is a PROTESTANT Ayatollah or Grand Mufti in Xian guise. There are already 3 Popes and 1 English Archbishop, the spirit of Protestantism wouldn’t even make room for morality based ‘edicts like this much less this ‘harmonize differences’ between differing sects and Santorum wants to impose these morality slanted views on porn on everyone else in a secular democratic government? What was suggested, could only be from someone who has a Theocracy in mind.
A smoking Loo, and still no direct evidence for whom to blame.
When I edit I plan which one or two or three items, moments, people I really want my reader to feel in their bones and carry with them.
Let me explain: when Democrats passed the 2,700-page Obamacare bill -- you know, the one that not one person bothered to read -- they didn't realize it contained several electoral time-bombs.
This used to be my playground. This crowded, hectic bus terminal in Blok M, Jakarta. I used to go here every saturday after school… in the late seventies and eighties. And while a number of things have changed since then (like that flyover that is being built), quite a few have remained the same.
Bel Paese
Rinse strawberries and hull out the middle of the strawberries with a melon-baller. Slice a bottom out of your strawberries so they can stand up. One strawberries are prepped set aside.
In a questionable grip on reality, the president recounted the ‘extraordinary’ growth of country’s military budget since 9/11 as he acknowledged that “global responsibilities demand leadership, the defense budget will still be larger than it was toward the end of the Bush administration.” Obama went on to make the prediction that the American people will “accept a defense budget” that ‘continues to be larger than roughly the next ten countries combined.” As the news networks almost entirely allowed the implications of DSG to slide under the radar neglecting to inform the American public of the president’s generosity regarding his new military strategy, the average American taxpayer remains unaware of Obama’s future foreign policy objectives and its consequences for social programs that millions of Americans rely on. Nor has the American taxpayer benefited from a presidential explanation of how a budget ‘larger than it was’ will affect the country’s fragile economic stability.
I started karate at 15 years old after a friend said it was great. 13 years later I've just acheived a 3rd Dan Black belt and the friend left 11 years ago! I'm not a very physical or sporty person which makes my acheivement extra special, for me anyway. I'm not the best in the class by a long shot but I don't compete with other people. I know that sounds strange coming from someone doing martial arts but there it is. I'm the highest graded female in the club and one of only 3 who have been there more than 10 years.
I am NOT truly hungry. I'm NOT.
I’m a horror fan so Dean Koontz, Stephen King and Anne Rice
Mario and I have always been late night mallers and we really tend to over-stay mostly due to taking the last movie sched on the list. Oftentimes we’d see the long queue at French Baker wondering what it was for. I thought people were probably just meeting up folks there and made FB (French Baker) their landmark. I know that guess is off so I also thought it was because of the end-of-day sale (EOD sale) but I set that thought aside since I didn’t expect people to start to line-up a few minutes past 9PM for an EOD sale at 10PM.
The ostensible reason for the investor excitement is the company’s acquisition in February of Healthcare Distributions Specialists LLC, which the company describes as a “value-added distributor of hard-to-find and specialty drugs.”
not in your mother tongue,
VG and DG were at our house for dinner. I walked over to the kitchen counter to get the dessert. A clear 9×13 baking dish was sitting on the counter in front of a white toaster. In the baking dish was a chewy chocolate concoction.
8. Tomorrow
CHICAGO – A federal judge convicted a Chinese-born American Wednesday of stealing trade secrets but acquitted her of more serious charges of corporate espionage at a trial in Chicago that highlighted fears about China pilfering US company secrets.
When my boys were at the age of playing these games, I would play with them. Sneaking around the outside of the house and pinging them with a Nerf dart weapon/dart gun/or stick that becomes a gun; it is truly exhilarating. As I write this I feel that spark still.
Triple strawberry fantasy certainly makes our eyes widen when it lands on our table. It's a bright red concoction of shaved ice drenched in strawberry syrup, crowned with a scoop of strawberry ice cream and surrounded by fresh strawberry halves. Globs of strawberry jam and rivers of evaporated milk make this a sweet and icy cold finish.
OK I was just 1/2 awake in bed last night, couldn't quite get to sleep, so I turned the TV on. It was 10:00, my normal bedtime since the dogs have been waking me at around 6 am these days. There was a show on about couponing, yes coupons, those paper things that come in the newspaper on Sunday. Actually the show, I think, was called "Extreme Couponing".
So, these are a few of my favorite things (in no particular order):
Success is failure turned inside out--
(Save to get the full sized pictures)
They took Wee Nicky by his Lip,
After researching a bit into this topic, I found out that another researcher put down the foundation stones of my question – what are the cultural differences in general? This researcher was named Geert Hofstede, and his research experiments that he did with IBM employees ties perfectly well into how these cultural differences are played out online. Overall, there are allegedly six binary categories in which societies fall towards one or the other spectrum. If you would like to read more on this, ask me for the PDF file.
A man with long hair holds up two fingers,
An intriguing notion – and perhaps if there is some glimmer of truth in this, then maybe this is why the world of Wodehouse is so compelling?
In the song, she refers to different colors that represents the ups and downs of relationships: making her see red, being green with envy. Together, she and her love are royal and purple.
In a place deep inside my soul are so many things
And yes, there will be yet another Spirit Award for sportsmanship, friendliness, and/or last place.
Remind me of the tangled history of BMI?
As the story goes, some of the Google employees didn't like having to walk all the way to the sidewalk along Charleston Road to get from the main Googleplex campus to the buildings on the other side of Permanente Creek (the three buildings that were the former location of ALZA, a pharmaceutical corporation). So, someone set up a zip line between the two sections of the campus. This was fun and dandy until the city found out about it then the zip line came down and people had to hoof it (my words, not Scott's) on the sidewalk once again... But only until the construction of the Google Gate Bridge was completed.
There is an e-book I think you can benefit from called: “The Little Book of Big Change-Be Happy, Make Money and Lose Weight” by Matt Beclcher. Here is the link to it: http://astore.amazon.com/self-help5300-20/detail/B004IK94A0
“I was a teenage boy once,” he said. “One thing. Sex.”
“Exactly. What better way to celebrate our anniversary? We can even go out for a fancy dinner, steak, or sushi, or something, maybe go see a show. When was the last time we went out? It’ll be my treat, Emily.”
Interesting enough even though in most things I'm extremely tidy and organized (and my studio usually reflects this) my art is generally messy - splatters, drips, frayed, torn, large swaths of cheesecloth hanging off the edge. So style? Probably contained chaos.
Nothing was explicitly said, but I got the feeling that their mom had always been strong-willed. They'd picked up the knowledge somewhere that morphine could cause confusion, especially in older folks. That's true, but she hadn't received any for a whole day. Could be lingering medication effects, could be not enough quality sleep, could be after effects of being on a heart bypass machine during surgery which can cause memory loss and confusion. They thanked me for my patience and headed off to a very early breakfast. I went back in to find her asleep again. Excellent.
11PM – dreamfeed. blissful for all concerned.
But then Barrionuevo’s biases begin to reveal themselves in much more obvious ways. He devotes the bulk of the article to criticism of Cristina’s failings without any mention of her accomplishments in education, poverty reduction, or human rights, and he describes her in unnecessarily harsh terms. (When he says that “with her emotional speeches and designer suits, Mrs. Kirchner appealed to the masses,” one senses that Barrionuevo isn’t complimenting Cristina’s oratory or her fashion sense.)
However, before inspiring a symbolically premonitory dream to Frederic of Prussia, Napoleon had already haunted the minds of some great prophets.
1 lb. Weyermann Munich Malt
Well, it’s Friday and I love Friday evenings. It’s especially nice because we have a three-day weekend from school. Heavenly ~
The result of the FCA has been to help create a thriving underground market in illegal guns. On the streets, a small pistol can be bought for 25 U.S. dollars, or an AK-47 for 100 U.S. dollars. In contrast, a legal gun costs about 500-625 U.S. dollars, plus more than 125 U.S. dollars for fees and mandatory training.
* Salma Hayek as Madame Truska
Lisa: Our Lake Tahoe vacation was when I knew he was the one. We stayed up late while everybody slept, just talking in front of a fire pit. We have had long talks before, but this one was different. I really got to see the sweet hearted person I was so eager to get to know. What really touched my heart was how he was such a gentleman, a great listener and cultured. Great qualities in a man! J
Leah
Grant got another promotion. YAY!!! He now works at the corporate office in Idaho Falls, and he L-O-V-E-S his job! So much so that we're considering not doing law school anymore. He's still going to take the LSAT, and he's still keeping up that GPA, but we love it here, so why would we leave such a love fest? I never thought Idaho would be our forever home, but I really can't see us leaving anytime soon.
Trello is a collaboration tool that organizes your projects into boards. In one glance, Trello tells you what’s being worked on, who’s working on what, and where something is in a process.
to interact with
Gwyneth Shepherd's sophisticated, beautiful cousin Charlotte has been prepared her entire life for traveling through time. But unexpectedly, it is Gwyneth, who in the middle of class takes a sudden spin to a different era!
That my country’s stability is so fragile in the eyes of some that a woman driving her own car and two women reporting the injustice of her punishment is a threat to its very unity is an indication of how sinister the women’s movement is to them and how seriously challenging it is to speak out for women’s rights.
Well of that there is absolutely no doubt! but it's probably not age that causes my problems getting back in the swing of things, it's habit.
and for one day each week, someone else cooks a meal for you.
This one is waiting for a base, I am looking for just the right stone to glue it onto with Roots curling around the stone.
Historically, most of the people who apply for the permit are those who make use of brew-on-premises businesses, like Brewers Apprentice in Freehold, or Brew Your Own Bottle, in Westmont. And with good reason: Brew-on-premises operations are sitting ducks for enforcement, and the owners risk their businesses by not having patrons sign up for the permit before making beer at their sites.
946 D-VI/1(A)/1986. “On Edwin A. Bergman (1917-1986).” Dedication, Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Words are often abbreviated to two syllables and end in "y". So, Stradebroke Island becomes "Straddy", Breakfast is "Brekky", and Barbecue is "Barby". Sometimes word are just completely different, like "Pram" is a baby carriage and "Chooks" are chickens. The following photo is the local Salvation Army resale shop.... notice the name. ;-)
One last note about the cost.... this project cost less than a comparably sized dresser ($249)and toy storage ($176) from Ikea, and far less than furniture from somewhere a little swankier like Pottery Barn Kids or Crate and Barrel. And the bonus is... no lost floor space in the nursery, which is not huge to begin with. Even though $350 sounds like a lot for a closet, it isn't a lot when you think of what you don't have to buy and the floor space you don't have to lose.
(kreuz.net) About 700 interested -- above all flee market sellers and other salesmen from alll of the North Rhein - Westphalia area stormed the Abbey flee market in Siegburg on Sunday afternoon on the 15th of April.
Author: Denise Grover Swank
My livelihood depends on the need of marketers to get closer to their customers and use their input to help them develop more effective ideas. So, in advocating that marketers spend more time thinking like people, am I a turkey voting for Christmas? I don’t think so. While I genuinely feel there are cases when research is conducted where it is simply not needed, the best outcome of marketers remembering they are people too would be better quality ideas. A greater proportion of the ideas that we put into strategic development research would at least be potentially right, rather than half of them being totally wrong. This in turn would enable us to spend more time gaining useful feedback and developing promising ideas rather than wasting time separating wheat from chaff. A higher initial strike rate is going into the project will give us a better chance of a high quality idea coming out at the end of the research.
5 caused
Camellia Oil harvested in Asia, Camellia Oil helps smooth the hair fiber, resulting in incredible shine.
- Show quoted text -
“We rehearsed that play last year in Drama Club. I played Penelope back then because I was the only girl who could remember all the poems and verses. She will never manage to do that. But I suppose all the parents will say how nice the princess looked and how nicely she played the role of princess. But if the poems aren’t recited properly it ruins the whole story… And she’s got a lisp!”
I've recently happened upon some advice that self-publishers need to stop blogging about self-publishing, and instead have an author's blog. Guilty as charged. But not for long. Check out my new blog at www.harmonylit.wordpress.com. Plans for this blog include weekly short story fiction posts featuring characters from the Akasha Series, sample reads, guest author posts, resources for readers and of course plenty of polls, contests and giveaways.
It is common for Christians to reference the foremost activity and action of God as giving gifts to humanity. Particularly as we see God's gift in the face of His Son Jesus.
2 pints fresh strawberries
Paramedics were on the scene of a house robbery in Blairgowrie, in northern Johannesburg, on Friday in which four people including two children were set alight.
This internet writing lark may be the future but give me a page you can turn any day of the week.
Current Part-time Volunteer Work
We were able to call one another on occasion, but phone calls were expensive. He was going to A School at Great Lakes in IL and lived in a barracks. I lived in a dorm and had a phone in my room. His phone was in a hallway, and was shared by all of the guys on that floor. When I called, I would have to tell the person who answered who I wanted to talk to and they would go to see if he was in his room or in someone else's room on the floor. The minutes added up!
When did you start working with Arnar Guðjónsson from Leaves?
They came out so cute and the kids loved them!
Richard Connar, watching the scene from the EM CopterCam video feed and talking to the reporting staff on board–
Official results:
01 Like Clockwork
The man who seems to be actively working to make everyone's life apart from his own and his friends' that little bit harder?
the altar of his dead wife’s name
Suddenly, I hear a piercing sound coming from District 1!
I think I'd frame this one too and not make a cuhion for Charlotte and Emily to sit on.
This can be very frustrating for anyone, especially people with such an independence like our Marissa. The therapist just asked that people make sure to work with her. This time will take pateience, practice, and understanding on everyone's part. If she ignores your texts and facebook posts- this isn't to be taken personal. Trust me, she is receiving an enormous amount of contact from people, and she just has to take responding one person at a time.
This one looks cute. Blu, the main bird, can't fly. He falls for a lovely bird, Jewel, that can. They happen to be in Rio which is not Blu's home. He's been kidnapped and wants to go back to Minnesota. But, he's got to fly to do so. Hilarity ensues. It looks like it will have both adult and child humor so that gives it a big bonus in my book. And for the kiddies, it's not just a mindless cartoon. Even from the trailer I can tell it's about finding yourself, not being afraid to take risks; basically it teaches a lesson while entertaining. Now isn't that sweet? My guess: 3-3.5 out of 5
I have to admit: Harrison Ford is so cool in these movies!
I loved the MOJO sketch for this week and tried to figure out how to incorporate this image with that sketch and here is what I came up with. True to form, I took some artistic liberties. But my punched circle scallop is supposed to suffice for the large circle.
I would love to see a way to detach and reattach the pacifier from the stuffed animal. One, so the stuffed animal can be washed when needed. And two, so we are not just buying a really expensive pacifier which would have to be replaced in its entirety if the pacifier is ruined.
Anyway...before I babble on about being different any further, let's talk about how Betsey is pretty darn Hime ^^;;
“To Evan Mornington Evans. I should prefer an open cheque, if you don’t mind. How would you like the picture packed? As it’s glazed, it will be really only necessary to protect the frame. It will go into your suit-case admirably.”
I also think that the Joseon fantastic four must be using a lot of old-timey phrasing, too, because Korean words that I should be understanding are going over my head--it's like watching a Jane Austen film if you're not used to Ye Olde British Vocabulary.
1 ebb
How dare the Muslims display their base ingratitude and pathological temerity when they call upon us, to bend to their barbaric ways?
Okay, so now let's talk about what we found today.
He's cheekier every day
We are in parlous times thanks to several administrations and congresses that have ignored the laws of economics that say you cannot borrow your way out of debt and keep spending at the same time.
More is coming!
“I didn’t know you in those days,” he replied.
RILEY: Really?
Life is
This month's colour challenge is Orange - Pink and Aqua.
~ Glimmer Mist in any shades you'd like your blooms to be
Thank you all so much for your lovely comments. It's been invaluable to have feedback and reactions to my words - I have learnt so much from you all. Particular thanks to Sarah Mac and Midlife Singlemum who have cheered me on with daily comments. And let's not forget NLP Mum my thanks to her for starting the Facebook page and keeping us all motivated. I'll miss you all and hope you'll stop by from time to time to see what I'm rambling on about and I promise to stop by and say hi on your blogs too.
glitter swirl
Nazri Aziz is another ‘enemy’. But we treat each other with respect and when we met for dinner more than a year ago I sat beside him and we treated each other like old buddies. After dinner, we debated various issues in front of an audience of 80 or 90 ‘Old Boys’ of the MCKK. We of course disagreed on almost all the issues but we debated like gentlemen and addressed each other with nothing short of the highest respect. And this was no show. This was sincere and for real.
JJ: Yeah, there is so much craft in it, y’know?…At the same time, it brings you hard up against the distinction between craft and art; craft won’t get you all the way there. In the end, there’s a leap.
I'm still processing what this means, but it's put the scare in me. I mean, I'm continuing to live my life, working out full speed ahead and moving forward with plans to The Lake House, but I'm much more cautious, and more than a little nervous. Andrew is too, and he now insists on being by my side for ev.e.ry.thing. from running to taking out the garbage to Ohmygod, that was a contraction wasn't it? Are you okay? Can you hear me? Is there a foot hanging out?!
And of course to get another chance to read my work which I love to do more than almost anything else in the world.
John first met Casey one shadowy afternoon when he didn't get to the lunch van in time and was in need of someone to go and get him a sandwich. He would have asked his secretary, but she had been taken ill with one of those stomach bugs that was doing the rounds that autumn, so he went to his boss's secretary instead. He was shocked to see Casey behind Miranda's desk. Miranda, his boss's usual secretary, had retired last week. John didn't know. He never paid attention to people such as secretaries - they were more like animated machines to him - not really people - not really worth his time or attention.
dash of sea salt
However comma dot dot dot (which looks kinda’ like this: However, …)
So, today was day 1 and let me tell you that Jillian kicked my butt. Seriously. It was intense, hard and tiring. My body is WAY out of shape. By the time I was done I was drenched in so much sweat I couldn't sit anywhere and had to shower immediately. An hour and a half later my legs were still shaking.
So today I find myself wanting to spring clean my life in preparation for reaching the milestone of entry into a third decade. I am proud of lots of my achievements so far (most obviously my boys) but there are lots of niggling things that I have been procrastinating with.
"Oh... WOW..."
Bill Fryer, whose agency gets you better results, or you don't pay, shows you how to optimise everything. Peter Hobday of Subscriptions Strategy Magazine - to whom I always turn when working in that particular minefield - made us all think.
—April 29–May 2, 2012
So here are, in my humble opinion, the pros and cons of The Hunger Games. Is this something we should be giving teenagers to read?
I got in the shower and had a flashback to him being born and Dr. A passing him to me. For a few minutes, the pain was as bad as it was that day.
I received Beauty tester mission and Caolion Product catalog. The right picture is Peeling Gel. It catches my eyes with silver case and pink.
We do many things that are motivated by fear, some that we are not ever aware of. If we fear anything but God, that motivation is sin and leads us away from God and into more to sin. The greater our sin, the greater our fear of his judgement.
That part I had already somewhat switched out. I've used the Active Moist before in the winter months, it is a great light weight lotion that really hydrates without shining your face.
The private spaces are defined by organic or curved volumes while the public spaces hold a more rectilinear and transparent character. The curved surfaces generate textures and shadows using traditional hand made Mexican brick as a lineal weave. These surfaces contrast with the glass and exposed concrete elements. The design sought a character made of continuous exercises of contrast: public vs. private, heavy vs. light, light vs. shadow; thus resulting in a contemporary expression of crafted materials.
Inexplicable splendour of Ionian white and gold.
My family and I drove to Connecticut from FL for a vacation last December. While we were there we went poking around the Goodwill Outlet store and found this wooden chair for only $0.99 (that's the price of a candy bar!!) I couldn't pass it up (along with some very vintage luggage), so our souvenir from our trip was this chair. And it sat in my craft room for 4 long months before I even looked in its direction. Until today.
I Can Do It! ¡Lo Puedo Hacer! Of course the first book I won was a children’s book, with zero description. I’m going to assume that it’s about a bi-lingual kid that can do a bunch of things, including running around in socks and a blanky cape. We’ll see what my kids think about it. I was a little annoyed at the PM I got from the author telling me to make sure I review it on goodreads and Amazon. Oh, and that she signed her name ‘Author,’ because I’m sure I would have just confused her for someone else who was asking me to review a book.
Her family - and all patients who battle cancer - continue to need prayers.
I reach for that bottle and its neck graces like a Gretsch. I snag the glass from the shelf and take my favored chair. My seat sits fine. My knee bends to help my boot heel the stretcher. The lid magically uncorks and the bottle tilts. Liquid pours forth vibrating glass with first notes. As sun hits my face I can’t help but watch it do-si-do through my glass. It dances, it prances, it giggles. It too hears the bourbon’s song.
He caps this reading off with a statement that seems, at first glance, to be not quite related. “Discernment is God’s call to intercession, never to fault finding.” All too often, discernment leads to gossip. Gossip becomes a “prayer request.” We must guard against this with all sobriety. In order to seriously intercede, we must be “completely and entirely identified with God’s interests in other lives.”
Finely grated zest of 1 Lemon
Queen Mary instructed Garrard's to create this tiara in 1914, copying the design of a tiara worn by her grandmother, Princess Augusta of Hesse.
will require using our markers, but for now you can use any coloring medium.
Today is the first day of the rest of my life.
Northern turbine photos with ice on blades.
I’ll keep you posted when the Fructosamine comes back!
One last bit of business for the day was to reopen the fuel tank and do a little more cleaning with acetone (which really works). By the time I finished, cleaning up and sealing the tank, Kostas came by and we talked of things to do and I showed him my progress. Then I showed him a major question which dumbfounded him and is a good one for all of you. Why do I have a raw water (with sea-cock) input tee-ing in with the, above waterline, output of the electric bilge-pump??? Anyway, the evening proceeded with hanging out with Kosta and Paula and drinking raki and talking music.
automobile how many folks lost their lives globally from
- 112 g / 4 oz / 1 stick of butter, room temperature
According to someone who went to the Cambridge folk festival there were CDs for sale there by The FLK, but they didn't appear to be flying off the shelves and there doesn't seem to be any trace of it online. Is it a slow month in the FLK's marketing department (which I imagine as an office full of people wearing badger and pig masks, listening to slightly downbeat techno)?
And if you published with CreateSpace, KDP, Nook Or PubIt or Smashwords (and some of the others) you had no advance, your PR was up to you, you had no contract, your book never went out of print, and you did not need an agent. No returns are accepted and many book shops wont hold your book unless there is a neighborhood demand for it.
WIP = Without Intending to Purchase: Taking a break from browsing the web, I walk over to the LYS just to say "Hi" That's all, just to say "Hi". "Hi" is an ambiguous term. Usually it means "Hello". In the LYS it means "I came here Without Intending to Purchase anything, but I must have these 4 skeins." So I head home with my ...
So let us all stop the sideline commentary, and instead, self commentate. Who knows maybe our lives might just improve?
As usual, the best method of obtaining specifications is to IMPORT your loadcalc into NROES when adding a new system to an order.
* Theme (sewing)
It is a day to remember.
It will carry your Loving Grace.
I offered it to you
John played someone who had taken refuge in the complex, and David said, “We have had a zombie includgion,” which we later discovered was an incursion of zombies who were looking for inclusion back in society.
I am not a Rupert Murdock flag waver I am simple highlighting the differences in the lever of power each person radiates by they way each person conducts themselves on camera.
Prince Paul (with De La) was to first to really make sophisticated ironic humor in hip hop (before that it was all “Pickin’ Boogers” Biz Markie humor... not that there’s anything unfunny about booger-pickin’ with Biz Markie). A friend of mine once argued that in the pantheon of concept albums, De La Soul is Dead is like the Beach Boys’ Pet Sounds. And Paul’s Prince Among Thieves is like Tommy. Your mileage may vary on that analogy, but it means SOMEONE SHOULD LET PAUL MAKE ANOTHER ALBUM.
Then we rode back to the park for a drink and some chips. Would have been lovely to have a beer but Katherine is a dry town and you can't have open bottles of alcohol away from home.
That afternoon after school found me in my father’s office at the palace. I burst into his office without knocking and then flopped down on a chair. Interrupting a conversation between him and his top economic advisor, I complained, “Why do I have to study two foreign languages? I have a friend who lives on a farm, and he doesn’t need to learn any.”
He was unhappy with Georgia’s running game, running backs, play-calling, a lack of scoring, not enough rushing, too much passing and the performance of running backs coach Bryan McClendon.
Packing in bags of insomnia as tightly
HaandBryggeriet IPA, also on tap, is an excellent IPA, very hop-rich, again with those distinctive toasted lemony notes, but this time wrapped in a sort of hempish mustiness. Again, it is not as overpowering in hop as Nøgne Ø IPA, and it’s not as dry, surely, but this has a good balance: it drives right up to the edge of too far, but it thankfully slams on the brakes just before it gets there.
But, in any event, the “war in heaven” is now reaching down to our planet, the Illuminati are about to be flushed down the toilet by the “God of Armies,” which some modern translations refer to HIM as. You notice that he also said that “within 20 years we will have a golden age that is unimaginable.” This is what they propose to do when they come here and take over this planet from the bad guys.
I'm going to throw in the Harry Tickets to the first person that buys them when they're advertised tomorrow locally.
We will post photos soon.
Head: Blue Small/Medium Fish Skull
Se Na hesitates to wake Park Ha up but the evil side of her won. She threw the milk inside the covered truck and leaves Park Ha sleeping at the back of the truck as the driver starts to go. When Park Ha wakes up, she cries for Se Na’s help and instinctively Se Na takes one step forward but stops and turns her back.
Isn't this the story where Reed Richards defeats the would-be invaders by convincing them that comic book panels are photos of real-life monsters that inhabit the Earth - basically using the conceit that, to comic book characters, drawings look like photos? Why, it's positively metafictional before the word was even coined.
Stormwind and Orgrimmar Children’s Week vendors Emmithue Smails (Alliance) and Alowicious Czervik (Horde) sell this ice cream in these trade districts.
No matter what happens in your life, some bad things will happen at times and you can do two things; sit there in the pain or stand up, face the issue and move on with your life. The moving on can be really hard for some people, they get stuck in the shame, guilt, pain, etc. for what ever happen. It’s hard to get up when something major happens, but believe me when I say this, the sun is shining bright somewhere for you to walk towards. There is always hope, no matter where you go.
and as we were ending our photo shoot, while I was on my tummy,
and the new words ticker tape by me,
Yes I’m still in the world of the living. Really sorry for being absent for longer than I said, I’ve been having a few personal problems of late that have been affecting my health (mainly worrying about money), but I’m back again.
Whitney Miller Challenge:
… and you’d always use past tense.
Wocka Wocka Wocka!
Well it is Monday and that means another AWESOME KARBER digi stamp! For this week I chose "APPLE GIRL" and you can purchase her here : http://www.karberdigital.com/food-beverage/248-apple-girl.html
And then Race Day was upon me. My husband and 3 of my 4 kids were travelling with me to Pacific grove, CA. My parents were in route too, from Merced, CA. All to watch me race and cheer me on. I wanted to throw up. On the drive there, I asked myself more than once, "what have you gotten yourself into??". Why the increased stress? Despite my Olympic Workout and ocean practice swim? I had discovered that I had only 4 hours and 45 minutes to complete the entire course . . . and my workout time was 4 hours and 41 minutes. I did not have much wiggle room. No room for a flat tire on the bike . . . no room for flipping over onto my back to rest on the swim . . . no margin for error.
of those awful years of my childhood
Q: Are there any ATMs (cash machines) in Australia? Can you send me a list of them in Brisbane, Cairns, Townsville and Hervey Bay ? ( UK )
I know a lot of my readers have young children. Did you know that the very young (those under five) have a much greater risk of fire related deaths than other children? The group accounts for 11% of fire-related deaths~ the highest population for any age group (United States Fire Administration is the source). Scary, isn't it?
The Canadian new wave punkers play their first ever gig in Athens this Sunday at Gagarin 205 and we're planning to be there.
I would like to take this opportunity to thank OWFI for giving me a scholarship to attend. The experience was more than I expected and the board did a great job organizing the entire event. The conference showed me what an invaluable resource OWFI is in pursuing a writing career. The support I fail to find elsewhere can be found here among others who understand me and my writing aspirations. I feel truly blessed in having found them. I connected and was welcomed by my local chapter the Norman Galaxy of Writers, even though I haven’t attended my first meeting yet. I look forward to sharing my writing travails with them.
If you want to buy running shoes but you also want to be in fashion, Saucony shoes are for you. They have a lot of pretty cool designs and their running shoes come with a wide selection of colors. Saucony has been on the shoe business for so long and they keep on striving to provide what the runners need. That’s why they can provide the most in-demand designs for running shoes.
For all of those who social network, LIKE our facebook page: “STRUT! The Magazine Editor in Chief Dr. Darcova Triplett.” Visit the page daily for the Sunday Spiritual STRUT by Keisha Clark, Health Tips by T’Shon Collier, Make-up Tips by Sonya Stegall, Business Tips by Shan Thomas and Shoe Tips (of course) by Nicole Hailey. Our fun and interactive facebook page also features Wednesday’s Watch Your STRUT and the Saturday STRUT Challenge. This STRUT is spiritual, mental and physical. Join the STRUT Movement!
Monsieur Lazhar, Canada
It is counter-intuitive to allow creative chaos. Every one of us would rather have control…the thing is, kids need a chance to have some control too…and that feels a bit chaotic for us adults.
Anyway, I had a great time with them :)
Go read her Blogger Pledge. Paste it up as the wallpaper on your monitor, print it out and post it where you need it. If you're making the transition from hobbyist to problogger, you need her advice.
The night will continue for me not at the dinner dance, but on a date with my husband! The first AFL match for the year sees my team and his team square off, so we are going to meet in town for some dinner then head to the MCG for the game.
On the up side, the Sun Up brew pub/restaurant was hopping when I dropped in around 1:00 PM to get the growler topped off. There was easy, casual banter going on between the wait staff and the clientele seated at the bar and the bar tendress indicated they were nearly out of the Nut Before Christmas Nut Brown, so I can only gather that business is good. Will I be back? Hell yes, I’ll be back! Who wouldn’t buy beer from a brewer named Uwe? (I went to high school with a dude named Uwe. You think? Nah.) Listen; if I was looking for Big Mac consistency, I’d be buying the Miller/Coors/Bud products more often. You buy a seasonal beer from a craft brewer and you take your chance, right?
I had a first on Thanksgiving too, Husband volunTOLD me to make a black-raspberry cobbler for Thanksgiving dinner (lunch in GMIL-speak) so I did. And I was pretty good at it! Usually when I try to do anything involving crust, it gets ugly. Things are thrown at Husband's head and my rolling pin takes a lot of verbal abuse. . .
Wade into the ocean
I ripped off the fabric and this is what we had. When I originally bought it was green and white zebra striped. I felt judged by the cashier for buying it and I didn't blame her...it was that kinda ugly. I painted it white before I Mod Podged it last time, but you can still kinda see the zebra stripes.
Meanwhile, in a large fry pan over medium heat, warm 1 Tbs. of the olive oil. Add the almonds and toast, stirring, until crisp and golden, 5 to 7 minutes. Transfer to a plate.
The other students watched the exchange. Being thoroughly confused I didn't know which way to turn. Maybe Emily had bumped her head out at recess? I asked her to come up to see me, hoping to clear up my confusion.
Personal Taste taught me to appreciate each and every character. It taught me to HATE In Hee like no other Kdrama villain has ever made me feel!!! To be honest, In hee’s character is so effective that whoever actress who played her is worthy of a trophy, or is it too much? She truly knows how to put A in HATE!!! So bravo to WANG JI HYE for making me hate In Hee to the core!
Then the fundraising appeal asks readers to contact their U.S. Senators:
And I think I’ve done this before. With martial arts many years ago, with Bible study methods, with psychology and counseling, with teaching and public speaking, with the piano, with vegan studies, with Spanish…all the things I love to do and have had some natural talent. I get to a point where I’m good enough at it to have fun and be social and express myself. Then I stop. I plateau and unleash my unlimited potential to simply be…average.
A problem we've been having with Faith is her digging holes. Both Freckles and Yoshi keep digging under the fences trying to get to her, and Faith tries to imitate them. We can't scold Freckles or Yoshi, but have to keep scolding Faith; her digging not only gets her dirty, but she might slip into the other lawns or hurt herself/have them hurt themselves. The fence separating her from Freckles is a rusty old gardening fence.
How do you use music in your classroom?
I. Love how you incorporated the circle!!
Now the jars are ready to go into my canner. You can see in this photo the three jars in front showing the three steps to putting the lids on. First make sure your jar rim is clean. Then put on the rubber gasket. Next place the white lid on top. Finally, put on the metal ring. Tighten as you normally would, then turn BACK a 1/4 turn. That is the only thing that was different about using these lids.
* Theme (masculine)
My children go to private school, my house comes with the job and as far as healthcare goes, it has to be private all the way.
New York, NY 10020
Magandang gabi! Buenas noches!
It matters because it’s an insidious way for errors of thinking to creep into your analysis. Or, if you prefer, it makes you get stuff wrong.
I'm posting this card today. I'm trying to get it done, before it storms here again. We had thunderstorms all night and heavy rain. This is Deedee's dollar digi for this week. It's a adorable clown image. I just love it.
Please know what a privilege it is to work with your son. He has now joined the family of missionaries serving with us, all of whom are committed to build Zion here by helping as many souls as possible to come unto Christ through baptism and the gift of the Holy Ghost. It is my prayer that the Lord will sustain Elder Carlisle in this new assignment.
I think that eyesight is one of the best of our senses. It allows us to see the smile on a little child’s face as they play, the beautiful color of flowers in bloom, and the majesty of an eagle soaring in the sky. We learn so much about the world around us and about how others are feeling by our sense of sight.
Our demands
Reading through news24′s archive of stories on rape made me sick to my core. Why have these issues on murder and rape become so normalised?!!
FYI - that's the real President on the left and the real Rahm on the right.
The Southern Cross drawing these eyes, I sort of melt into it.
I would love to hear any suggestions from you about systems you use in your home to help you stay organised, or at the very least, sane, with a new born and/or toddlers. Please do contribute; I think we will need all the advice we can get!
(Jesus Loves Me)
Hope you all are surrounded with friends and family, and have a merry Christmas! Make sure to eat your candy (and share it too)! ;)
1/2 c butter, melted
Complete previa – The placenta completely covers the cervix.
It took a while, but we made it.
I don’t remember feeling tired and yet about another thirty minutes later I was sound asleep. I didn’t wake until 8:30 – unbelievable! It was probably the most restful sleep I have had in a long while. I read some of the posts on my course page responding to the question of whether parents of youth offenders should be held criminally responsible for the action of their child and possibly even incarcerated. I thought a great deal about responsibility and how as a society we shy away from taking responsibility. Are we born knowing responsibility? Do we need to be taught about responsibility? How do we learn to live responsibly? As wonderful an instrument our brain is, is it flawed? It seems too easy to be hard wired for an irresponsible existence. Oh, so many thoughts and so few answers!
… I have a possible future.
So my friend Alan and I went on our own, first taking out a small bank loan to pay for the drinks and chocolate raisins that we feel is an integral part of the cinematic experience.
There's not much technical info on their website, but a Double IPA is always music to my senses. However, not in this case. Expecting a Double IPA in what seems to be the de facto American tradition, the aromas are quite muted, and I have to admit I transferred some to a snifter to try to concentrate them. What's there is pleasant, though, with a nose full of caramel, sweet mandarin peel, a pinch of nutmeg and floral undertones. On first taste, the body is is very pleasant, presenting a soft, chewy caramel base, cut with a lime-like freshness. The middle ground flies by rather swiftly (sorry!), flashing rounded pear, a little banana, to be replaced with a mildly sorbet-like finish that is sweet with long-lingering citrus notes and an edge of butterscotch. I have to admit, I was disappointed in not getting what I expected, but it's a decently-flavoured, moreish, easy-drinking beer.
Sunning myself on lunch break one day. I think this was one of those days where I needed to feel Mother Earth against me. To feel grounded. The sun and the earth help with this.
1. Last weekend we went to a party. Nice people, some kids for ‘Timan’, good food and drinks, but most of all, good dance music. And this music (and probably the food and too much sugar) made ‘Timan’ hyper, he kept jumping and dancing, but all of a sudden running and running like a perpetuum mobile. He didn’t stop anymore. Eventually we had to leave and it took ages to calm the tot down afterwards. Even at home, it was around 11pm, he wanted to party and ‘run’ to the music. Oh, little one, dancing is perfectly ok, just skip the running, the only thing you do is knocking over other people.
TIP #7
The cycle infrastructure is typical for a main radial road, in Dutch cities. It is a mixture of separate cycle paths and on-pavement cycle paths, with cycle lanes on the old streets of the city centre. The section though Haarlemmerstraat and Haarlemmerdijk was shown in the other direction, on an earlier video.
I used Cascade 220 superwash. It was the first time I used a superwash on a sweater this size. I won't lie and tell you I wasn't a bit nervous to throw into the washer...but I did and it came out super soft and fluffy!
Today, I'm very excited to present THE REVEAL of the Princess' Bedroom!
Love all the bright colours! Our sponsor this month are Gilli Stamps who has a goodie bag for the winner and Michelle Perkett with a $10.00 gift certificate. These colours totally reminded me of a DCWV pack I have called Citrus, so I designed this card for a little inspiration!
Dr. Baskerville writes:
I’ve just realized that I haven’t blogged in forever! I have been so caught up with the girls that I coach as well as lots of random errands and events and such that I haven’t really thought about blogging. Do you ever have weeks like that? Weeks that just seem to get away from you and when they are over, it’s like they almost never happened because it’s such a blur!
We then mooched around the tiny streets, browsing through piles of books and resisting the urge to buy everything in the multitude of vintage stores that have popped up in the last couple of years.
When planning themes/activities for parties, I always think of these two things -
Now there’s this: two years without a bowl. 30 scholarships. Shame and scarlet letters. This isn’t SMU bad, but we all knew it wouldn’t be. Reggie Bush would’ve had to skullfuck the Statue of Liberty with twin antique shotguns – blunderbusses, even – purchased for him by Eric Dickerson and Craig James, emptying the barrels to a sedate 4/4 gangsta rap penned in contracted collaboration with Snoop Dogg, Drew Rosenhaus, Maurice Clarett and Brian Bosworth circa 1986, and somewhere in the torch Noam Chomsky is taking Bush’s Sociology test and totally inviting the wrath of the NCAA and its attendant death penalty by being an enabling douche and not even bothering to fake the B+ because Pete Carroll’s there, egging him on with whoops and high fives and exhortations about perfection being the journey and not the destination, so ace the multi-choice already, Noam. That could’ve gotten USC the death penalty, but that wasn’t what happened so no death penalty. That was a given. But this?
Classic horror is from a more innocent time. The genre spawned fantastical tales of mystique and intrigue, whimsical yet frightening stories of foreboding and human folly turned sour. This is Black Sabbath, a veritable example of exactly that kind of pulpy greatness.
If we were out together with friends and I spent more time talking to the friends than to him then I was chastised and punished for ignoring him.
Anticipated acquisitions, joint ventures and divestitures.
“It is quick house built in seven days if you have a patch of land. Basic model of 20 sq metres, with flat roof will cost around 500 euros (around Rs 32,000).
JoNo has also had homework each night. Spelling and Math mostly. He loves it! It's quite surprising, really. He is in a special reading group because he is not on grade level for reading and last year, his spelling was HORRIBLE! But this past week, he only missed 2 words out of 16 on his pre-test. If he missed one or gets them all correct on his pre-test, then he gets the challenge list for the week instead. My poor reader is a good speller? Somewhere that doesn't make sense. But maybe that just means that the reading is about to jump up to grade level?
Moses assumed that the total responsibility of teaching, guiding and governing the Israelites fell on him. And so it is with many of us.
Architecture is something related to really material stuff. This because it is strongly linked on how the market goes. Once you try to put this kind of thinking, you are discussing about some really fundamental things of our society. I don’t think we can really overturn this, but I think it’s our duty to try to put – as we say in Italian – some grains in the gears, something which can produce some frictions, to make some slight perturbations in the system that could lead to some unpredictable consequences.
I was psyched
By breaking humans of this focus on ego, He will change their focus back to concentrating on Him, or they will cease to exist. He is accomplishing this by slowly removing the positive influence of the Holy Spirit on the world. Through the Holy Spirit, He provided favorable environment for humans to live on the earth. When the Holy Spirit is removed, the environment becomes unfavorable for humans (e.g. drought, fire, earthquakes, etc.).
1. Honest, integrity, fabulous craftmanship, made in America.
ROME!
Randi needs rock and roll to fuel her rise from the ashes of the past year. She's back on stage fronting her old band, RAPTOR SNATCH, and nothing is going to stand in her way! Certainly not the jealous rival band, Slutmaster - inaccurately named, and hell bent on stealing her place in the spotlight.
AKB48’s Watanabe Mayu absent from nationwide tour due to poor health Big Bang’s Seungri & Daesung to Accompany IU as MCs on Inkigayo KARA acknowledged as the current “hot models” in advertising CNBLUE’s Yonghwa is a “totally arrogant man”? CNBLUE’s Jungshin & Minhyuk comment on voting for the first time + idol first time voters Donghae & Eunhyuk’s “Oppa Oppa” ranks #2 on Oricon’s weekly chart Chatmonchy reveals details on upcoming single JBlogAsia Search For An Admin Teenager Arrested for Selling Fake AKB48 Handshake Event Tickets NYC Reveals New Single “Haina” S/mileage reveals “Dot Bikini”‘ Full PV
These are the authors and their works I'd love to discuss with them. What about you? I'd love to hear which author you would love to pick the brains of and what work you would discuss with them. Tell me in the comments. I'd love to make another post with a list of novels/short stories for discussion.
As the debate over the role of government continues, the winner of that debate should come from the capitalist or financial class. The U.S. Supreme Court’s holding in Citizens United increased the political strength of corporations. Returns from this new found strength will depend on how well capitalists and financiers, via their corporate structures, are able to leverage their campaign and other messaging.
It must include a stocking (bort or made)
After that I waited in line for a little longer with other people waiting to get individual photos taken with Nicholas, Mark, Claire, and Mercedes – most of them were also Buffyfest VIP pass holders. I signed up for a photo op with Aaron Douglas, and hurried off to line up for the Nicholas Brendon Q&A – I was further back in line, but the back of the room wasn’t full, and I got a good seat in the VIP section.
①・・・Shiena(Italian Greyhound)
“Shutup fam, like you didn’t enjoy it. We saw your face, sket!” Nathan shouted. Before he could even finish his sentence, we heard the door slam open, followed by heavy panting.
3.) Become a Fan of our Facebook Page leave a comment
SU Stamps: Field Flowers, Hello Doily, On Your Birthday
So move forward on your freshly established path, and be alert and observant to the opportunities, people, and events that will enable your intentions to become reality. Embrace the changes and challenges you encounter and nothing will be able to hold you back.
Trois Pistoles
Prime Minister Pierre Elliott Trudeau also famously “flipped the bird” to the folks of Salmon Arm, British Columbia, widely seen as disrespectful to Western Canada. Thus, the “Western Finger Ale.”
The Underdark is shared by a great number of highly organized malicious creatures. As a contrast to the regimented societal structure of the backstabbing drow, there's the alien society of the equally malicious well-oiled machine of the illithids. The thing that keeps them working in such perfect order? The Elder Brain.
I’m so potassium deficient I can’t even move my fingers properly today. Typing is making them tingle and they’re beginning to go numb. It feels like a non-painful version of hitting my funny bone. Not funny, and not great timing.
To advocate for others,
What is the Guarapad Blood Pressure Pad or Plaster for the feet?
All the way along Jalan Tun Perak, we could hear Bersih and Anti-Lynas chants. Of course there were also reformasi & anti-BN chants but they were not as strong as the Bersih & Anti-Lynas chants. I also mentioned to wifey that this rally cannot be political and I refused to chant anything but Bersih chants, maybe Anti-Lynas too.
Peter made this carving once we had moved house. It is a farewell. Although we had physically left the farmhouse it took me a good year to say goodbye, I mourned for what had been. But I had been taught some valuable lessons; that nothing is set in stone and that it is best to be flexible and enjoy the present, for who knows what tomorrow may bring.
The details are clear, but everything else–exactly where or when this happened–is fuzzy.
Do you remember that hour of din before the attack--
After all day working, I just wanna lay dawn and sleep. I guess I need a vacation. Already.
Heat enough oil, let splutters the mustard seeds, urad dal,dry red chillies and asafoetida powder, add immediately the chopped onions,chopped tomatoes, slit opened green chillies, salt,sauté everything for few minutes until the tomatoes turns mushy,now add the chopped eggplant pieces,chopped snakegroud pieces, sauté for few minutes until the veggies get half cooked..Add a cup of water, sambhar powder to the veggies,bring everything to boil,finally add the cooked toor dal to the veggies, cook until the veggies get well cooked...
Good Morning,
(There will be a panel discussion on the future of the East River waterfront, moderated by Roland Lewis, President and CEO of the MWA, on May 6 at the Museum of the City of New York. Scroll to bottom for details.)
The answer to where they are could be found last night at the Will Rogers Auditorium. Often at political events there is a sense of excitement, anticipation, a certain buzz in the audience while waiting for the main event. Excitement, anticipation and buzz are weak and inadequate words to describe the pre-rally crowd last night. Energy is even inadequate. What undulated through the thousands who thronged outside before the doors opened last night was a kinetic power, the power of hope, the power of liberation, the power of anger at a system turned upside down, the power of liberation and, yes, the ultimate and emancipating power of freedom. You had to be there to understand it.
Recently a Spanish translator asked me exactly what was meant by ‘pitch black’, as he understood it ‘pitch’ was a toss or throw, a place to play football, or a bid to sell something. It is then as you try to explain the allusion to road surfaces and tar and pitch that you realise yet again the infinite richness of our language. Then I set off on my regular morning website trawl, starting always with the wonderful Jeffrey Wells’ Hollywood Elsewhere. A glimpse or two at twitter and then usually a phone call to my closest friend, illustrator Mick Brownfield for our doubly procrastinating water cooler chat which might be, (invariably is) about an obscure British film of the 1950s, sections of which either of us have suddenly found on youtube. I might then add something to my blog. This is usually book related, and most likely connected to an aspect of illustration, decorative art, or the movies. I recently added a post about the Rex Whistler murals in the Tate Britain restaurant, and another on Clouds in Films.
There’s more.
They add a bit more sparkle
Here's the photograph I'm currently writing a tutorial for
Main Course. Woodlands and Forest! Pan Roasted Guinea Hen with hen of the wood, wild rice, pickled autumn berry and ramp bulb, and egg yolk and horseradish powder. It was all so good that I am running out of adjectives.
I think we followed the doctor's instructions decently well. And it accomplished the goal, which is good! So here's the hoping she will begin to sleep through the night again!
At around 12.30 the Artist and I got up from the table and said it was time for us to go.
So, last Saturday I fell on the ice. It was a BAD fall that resulted in me going to the emergency room and spending quite a long day there. Let me tell you about that!
world an incredible gift
Shihoco
Where there is doubt, the faith;
So I'm sitting here eating a packet of "Squirtin' Skulls", a Halloween sweet I bought not because of the occasion but because they looked good. Remember those sweets you used to get that had some kind of gooey liquid sugar in the middle? Well, these were nothing like that. The skulls had no flavour and there almost no goo within. They were quite possibly the biggest waste of a pound, ever. Naturally, I'm being a little melodramatic when I say that but surely this is the time of year to over blow things? It is Halloween after all and what do most people do on Halloween? They get pished whilst wearing white sheets with eye holes in them.
In a nutshell, the Imago premise is this: we all emerge from childhood with “wounds”, along with an unconscious idealized image of our caregivers. As adults, this image (which psychologists term an “imago”) compels us to choose romantic partners resembling one or both of our parents. That is attraction. All going well, we will soon be daft with euphoria, because we believe we’re finally going to get what we didn’t get in childhood. (No, not the Sega mega-system. You will never get that.) This is romantic love. And marriage – well, that is where the real fun begins, because marriage is the arena in which you may heal childhood.
I’m from a canister of popcorn in lamplight as Sense & Sensibility warms the screen, from butterscotch cookies baked for friends, a cool swim in a black bikini, morning jogs into slow-waking spring. I’m from a sofa warmed with a homemade afghan, from purring kittens and walls of butter yellow paint, from a scooping blue chair by the window and ceiling-high shelves of school books battered and scratched with ink. I’m from a glass-top dining room table and linoleum kitchen laughter, from a well-fed refrigerator, peanut butter on celery and carrots snatched before supper while the TV hums Alex Trebek.
Maybe all of this squatting and cleaning will give me some contractions...and then again, maybe not!
NO BULL PREMISE: A Chinese-American woman explores her great aunt’s turbulent life while examining privilege, progress and filial piety.
So, Now it’s not too late.. Let's forget our egos, past……….., and express our love to others………. Be friendly…………… keep smiling and be happy for ever…
Two private grant examples for AIE grants are the Charles Lafitte Foundation (http://www.charleslafitte.org/thearts.html) and The Elizabeth George Foundation (P.O. Box 1429, Langley, WA 98260), which offer grants to unpublished fiction writers, published or unpublished poets, emerging playwrights, and organizations benefiting disadvantaged youth.
Yesterday, at our request, a representative from the Department of Agriculture came out to visit and test our chickens in conjunction with the National Poultry Improvement Program. NPIP is a voluntary program that provides testing for common ailments in home and commercial flocks. NPIP helps us to ensure a safe food supply and avoid the transfer of disease through other means (after all, taking care of chickens is not a hands-off activity here at the Flying T). In addition, it allows those who raise chickens to avoid unnecessary medicines and antibiotics. Finally, by working exclusively with NPIP-certified hatcheries and home producers, we can reduce the chances that our healthy flock is infected by birds or chicks we purchase as replacement stock.
As I have said before I add my pasta to the pan that has the sauce so that the last bit of cooking time is in the sauce. It allows the sauce to incorporate into the pasta itself making for a much more delicious result!
The Llandudno Cable Car
Writing is something I have always wanted to do—I wrote my first book when I was seven—but it wasn’t until I retired that I found the time to devote to it at a serious level. Even then it wasn’t quite as simple as knocking off a book in one go, for it took me over twenty drafts and
I think this is going to work pretty well for us. Thanks for making it one of the challenges, Toni!
He bent down and pulled out the ring, saying so fast the words all melted together into: wilyamaryme?
How do you store/sort your magazines? Maybe you had a brilliant storage solution for another area of your home? How many subscriptions do you have? What’s your favorite read?
There is a fascinating potential here.
Happiness is what I feel now
Cheese………. and crackers
a big lump on her head), and as I tried to grab her my laptop fell to the
Much love ladies!
I bought this little cart at Walmart for around $13. It's the best purchase I've ever made. The kids can sort their own laundry, and it fits into the small space I have in the laundry room. I keep a laundry basket on the floor for towels.
And the buildings in which we inhabit seem permanently here. We cannot escape their shadows as we navigate from one interior to the next. The 21st century is littered with reminders of architectural decisions made remotely in the past: these are buildings by planners and architects with the most inhuman and obtuse of theories, and buildings from which we ought to, in many cases, recoil in embarassment and even depression. Our buildings, whether commercial or cannot so easily be escaped unless we opt out of modernity altogether and decide to live as anarcho-primitivists claim we should live.
Pottery Barn candle holder; GW why are you so good to me? =D
It reeked of death and acid
This young woman also posted before pictures in which she is sporting zero body fat. She appears to be fit and mentions that the photos were snapped after a fitness class that she taught. She goes on to say that she has already noticed that her flat stomach is even flatter after a few days on the challenge. I can only assume she is aiming for a concave stomach.
Invite me to remember and smile and linger
I can stand at the foot of the cellar and look out towards the barn (or where it used to be) where I had so much fun as a child. I can hear grandma say, "Calvin! Will you get some fruit from the cellar."
You can’t believe that women have actually survived this and you never knew about it. Not really, anyway.
Is this an opportunity to take someone’s territory? Steal their wallet? Laugh at their situation?
So what should it be? Ice cream, cookies, macarons, cake...I'm only going with one so I better make a choice soon before all of this "discipline" goes right on out the door and all of these calories go right on to my thighs. Decisions, decisions....
When you see something that makes you think, you should.
You run your own night called Sub-Woofah. How did you find balancing this, University and DJing?
Nov 27 Astoria London, UK
I went out on FMLA for 2 weeks, and have gone back to work on a reduced schedule. I talked to them about the Bipolar Disorder and they told me that when I don't feel like I can work, I need to take FMLA, not to come in. And if I do come in, I will be held responsible for whatever happens. If I had to work tonight, I don't know if I would be able to. My FMLA protects me from being fired for calling in, but it doesn't feel very good to take off work and leave the place short-staffed, it puts a lot of pressure on me.
4 ♥ 3:17
Hmmm. What hotel? If they were allowing him Internet use, why wouldn’t he be able to make a collect telephone call? Who did he talk to at what embassy?
“You can?”
…we’re in!
Here's an easy way to make the dirt: Bake the cupcakes as directed on the box (BTW, toss the mix that comes with the box. Blegh! Buy your favorite brand instead!) Next, with your fingers, gently pull the top off of the muffin. Pipe in a little chocolate frosting. Return the top to the flower pot - UPSIDE DOWN! Press into place. Perfect dirt every time! Add a gummy worm.
“Yeah, well, my middle name is my great-grandmother’s first name and my great-great-grandmother’s first name and my grandmother’s middle name. So I’m kinda named after all of them. But it is just one word.”
- Before I baked this, I checked out the experience of the TWD bakers, such as my friend Di (here's her post), and I learned that the filling tended to be dry and the crust browned quickly. Since I was baking my pie/cake in a dark silicone loaf pan and was using a new-to-me oven I reduced temperature to 350 degrees
The site is in norwegian and will be suitable for any who knows the nordic languages inshaa Allah!
I’ve come across odd encounters during the month of April. I actually have come across much of these things whenever I wander on streets. Anything I found out of place, odd and messy, I snap it. It’s also sometimes a great way escape from street photography with human in it. Scanning for human activities although had become part of my nature now. I can get tired especially after work, from whole day staring at computer screen.
Supplies - basic grey Oliver paper, stampin up twine, Tim Holtz forest moss ink - I'm not sure about the stamp or brads.
There was much more that he said. Some of it was so new to my ears that I don't feel equipped to try to rewrite it here. And some of it didn't sit right with me, so I'm choosing not to repeat it here. It's my blog after all. :)
‘unconventional shale gas’ ‘ Eh! a lone convulsing satan’
By comparison, the California Public Employees' Retirement System, the largest U.S. public pension with $234.8 billion of assets, has between 70 percent and 75 percent of the money it needs to cover future liabilities, according to Brad Pacheco, a spokesman. Calpers, as the fund is also known, cut its assumed rate of return to 7.5 percent from 7.75 percent March 14.
Granted,. this is not a new idea and has been around for years, but I dont see a lot of people offering these styles fairly consistantly. I adopted this technique years ago with many other skirts, pants, and dresses - and whoever I was inspired by (probably the Belgians in the 90's), we thank you!
Apply with sponge brushes your Distress inks. The ink does rub off, so I did take my ink pad and "rubbed" it in areas where it was going to need the most amount of coverage. If you missed places with the mod podge and you have areas where tissue is exposed and the ink hits, it will become darker and more noticeable compared to other areas on the shoe where its just "hinted" of color.
Thank you for stopping by! If you can’t let your chickens free range, or you want your chickens to help out in the garden, I highly recommend a chicken tractor. The really are handy to have on the urban farm.
In the few weeks that you've been on this earth, you've shown me that there is such a thing as unconditional love. You've made me realize how much I should appreciate my own mom, and I know she'll probably read this so we should thank her too. Without your gramma, there's no way I would be who I am today.
“Watch the choppers!” Pitcher shouted.
However, the dollar needn’t be the death knell for the non-resource segments of Canada’s economy. By playing their cards right, manufacturers can turn the higher currency into an advantage—or at least less of a hurdle.
I would love to hear your comments on your experiences of phonics with your preschoolers and young children?
As the ends of such a partnership cannot be obtained in many generations, it becomes a partnership not only between those who are living and those who are dead, but between those who are living and those who are dead, and those who are to be born.
which is often even better than the former life.
I'm trying not to get my hopes up because these things rarely work out but...IF we can make a fun trip out of a work trip, I'll definitely be figuring out how to squeeze a race in (5k/10k) so I can scratch a state off my list. Ideally, I would love to go to ATL so I can possibly hook up with two of my most favorite bloggers:
* The girls have played outside for a large part of the day. One seasonal change
There is a plan to redevelop an old industrial estate in My Kind of Town into a massive housing development. It's sparked a lot of controversy, not least because of the jobs that will be lost to make way for shiny new homes. It will also mean a newly-emerged artistic and vintage quarter will be wiped out quicker than you can say restoration, restoration, restoration.
This being said, a few of you have told me you cannot comment on the blog itself... I am not a very blog savvy person, but here is my feeble attempt to give some instructions as to how to easily view/comment on the blog.
I just sat staring a the blood. I nearly fainted and just burst into tears. I couldn't believe that this could be happening to me again after all we had been through. I quickly went back to my desk and called Dr N and she told me to come straight in for a scan. I called my Mum as Hubby was working away and she met me at the hospital. Mum held my hand anxiously with reassuring words and I felt like I couldn't breathe.
Monday was the anniversary of my dad's death. Nine years ago. Stomach cancer.
Plot-wise this is a vast improvement upon the first volume, which had some serious pacing issues. And while the supernatural elements this time too turn out to be explicable through ordinary means, there aren't any of the abrupt tonal shifts that plagued the previous book -- once we find out the truth of what's going on, it doesn't get any less creepy.
1) I bet a lot of you already know how to make your own fabric covered buttons so you can skip this first part, but if you don't already know how easy it is, just follow along.
I don’t eat me spinach and I’m not a man. But I am what I am. And I’m glad I’ve done what I’ve done. I took a long time to think about it. I took four years from the time I finally decided to do something about the dysphoria pushing me around all my life, until The Op. Four years trying to make sure that what I thought I wanted–to be a straight girl basically, and anatomically correct as far as the state of the art was capable of fashioning me–was what I really did want. That’s as much of an answer as I have to the question “how do I know?” Listen, listen, listen deep inside, pay attention to what you find, ask yourself again why you want what you are after. Try really hard not to shy away from the answers that resolve from the inky black of your Magic 8 Ball.
I don’t mean to suggest that this possible groundswell doesn’t favor Democrats, but that's only in places where they don't currently hold office AND there is an incumbent. All bets are off in races where the incumbent isn't running. This feels like the same simmering disappointment that turned into voter anger in both 1976 and 1980. And its roots are not just Iraq or worries about the economy. The general sense is that the country is foundering and people are wanting a clear direction.
No. I respond. He will be just fine. See ya' for dinner?
That more than anything, I am afraid. I am afraid that the people that I love in this world do not love me as much as I love them, that they CANNOT love me as much as I love them. The only exception to this rule has been my children, and in your death one of the only people on the planet that truly loved me died in my arms without ever having said hello.
I was there with my husband Richard and sister Jennifer. We heard some of our favorite musicans, like the Brass Band of California who are always lively, funny and accurate. (I got some tips about 1860s Music Hall traditions.) We also managed to catch Wylie and the Wild West and the Hot Club of Cowtown. I missed Sourdough Slim and his saw-playing sidekick, but Richard and Jennifer loved them.
Introduction of CHITI
3. Don’t answer the mail.
And lo behold,
Uncertainty for the markets generally means downside, a.k.a., the path of least resistance, and considering the massive crosscurrents only a strong ray of sunlight (QE3 here and abroad?) might save the day. That “sunlight” would glisten off of gold.
So many people are engrained with school that they can't see past it. Some say they respect home schooling, private school, charter schools etc...while still advocating public school.
I’m not sure about the long term viability of this show. I am perfectly ok with it having one, really good season. The premise is such that once some key plot issues are resolved, I can’t imagine it staying interesting. I wouldn’t mind getting the opportunity to watch the attempt however.
Instead Rachel loaded Sims 3. Maybe this would be the nudge Jessica needed to leave...a subtle hint that the visit needed to come to an end.
The Pleasures Of Love
Because that whole commercial allowed me to relate and that irritates me. Because depression really does affect everything. I have really hit the rock bottom, but unlike some few people I can mention *Ahem* I am doing my very best to pull back up again.
The Local Taphouse Stars & Stripes SpecTapular,
I will say travel. But I think I would travel to mostly Spanish speaking countries so that I could work on building my confidence in speaking Spanish. I love to travel and see different cultures and customs.
But finishing up, here are a few more images to drool over. Summer lovin’ indeed!
She shuddered; a cold shiv ran up her spine. Then there was a bump against the inside of the door and Lizzy’s heart stopped for a beat. It happened again, though softer the second time and Lizzy remembered to breath. There was a scuffle going on in there; a kidnapping perhaps. Or maybe someone was being murderlized.
What about this word “ever,” though? Is it a good word to use to describe the last few decades in Earth’s climate history? Well, if you like crazy, it’s a great word! Originally, climate science articles in newspapers and magazines were careful to state that the “third warmest year” was merely the third warmest in the modern record. And some articles do still draw that distinction. What seems to have led to widespread use of the word “ever,” though, was tired, drama-seeking headline writers (I’ve been there), putting the newspaper or magazine together late at night and needing to convey a lot of information in a small number of words. “2010 hottest ever during one climate agency’s century-and-a-half-long instrumental record” doesn’t make a top-shelf headline, not at all. “2010 ranked hottest year ever,” now you’re cooking with gas! That’s a headline. And headlines sell newspapers; they make people feel engaged.
So, how does this fit into the larger bullying that is going on, out in the world? It seems clear to me, that if kids are being bullied from a very young age, by those that raise them, that it would only make sense to bully others as a way to feel a sense of control over their own environment.
This is one of the inner pages:
"In Britain, psychedelia is totally linked with nostalgia, and it shouldn't be. Psychedelia's about exploration,discovering new colours. It is not about looking back 20 years. That's as irrelevant as cabaret bands playing Elvis covers. Psychedelis's always got to go "further".
Beep-beep-brrrrp-vrwwt-szgyxx-vroom…….
The nastiness, if people are so inclined, should be directed at the Mail itself. They know what they are printing, and they know the kind of reaction articles will get from its slightly hysterical readers. And they encouraged it. Well, they have to make money, you may think. But they also have a responsibility to show a duty of care to their employees, even if these people are employed on a freelance basis. They have made a fortune from this article and the attention it has received, rightly or wrongly from the world at large.
Let the dough balls rest in the fridge for one hour. Meanwhile preheat oven 180°C. Line out two baking trays with baking paper. Take the dough balls out of the fridge and put them on the baking tray. Bake the cookies in the lower third of the oven for 10 to 15 minutes (depending on how hard you like them). Cookies will flatten a bit and should be golden. They are still soft when you take them out of the oven. Let them cool completely on a cooling rack.
A nice effect is the walking IV in which the interviewer and guest stroll side-by-side toward the camera. The camera operator walks backwards maintaining a constant distance. Obviously this must be well planned. The camera operator should have someone to act as a guide — the usual routine is for the guide to place their hand in the middle of the operator’s back and walk with them.
We moved in just a week before Megan was due, I brought her home from the hospital to the first house she ever knew. As she grew up, we walked through the town almost every day, crossing and re-crossing the foot-bridge over the railway, from east to west, past the library and the church, between school, shops and home. We picked blackberries in Jubilee Park when the weather was good, pick-and-mix in Woolworths when it was bad.
Ok. Enough of my complaining. Just tell it to me straight. Get over it. Its a dang ankle, stop complaining.
No, there was a school band, then there was one band which never played any gigs, so Sparks were my first proper band.
For clarity – and to dispel the sense that I might be a Luddite imposter here – I’m a daily user of new technologies; the happy owner of blackberry, iPhone and iPad. And I can’t imagine a working life without technological tools developed over the past two decades. For a humanities graduate I spend an astonishingly large portion of my life analysing data mined out of the Oracle database that is the fundamental infrastructure for the business I currently work in.
If the men only started going bald when they were 30 or 40, there was no difference in their risk of developing prostate cancer compared to the healthy group. Read more>>
I am 15, perched behind a steering wheel of an out-of-date white state car, with a rough-looking character known as the Driver's Ed teacher.
After some consideration I decided that what would best give him an insight into the strange wonders that lurked in this world of mine were these two classics below:
LIVE OAK BREWING COMPANY Gravity cask of Hefeweizen
he smiled with that cretinous enthusiasm and optimism which is difficult for non-Americans to counterfeit.
I just wanted to send a huge thanks to all my friends who helped make this 28th birthday the best ever. I've been going through some really rough stuff and having wonderful friends who stand by your side makes things so much easier. I am truly blessed and touched by each and every one of these ladies. Love you all!
The truck driver asks him "Why did you do that?!"
Of course there was hate on the interwebz: that people were stupid to put their confidence in someone they'd never met, that her readers were stupid to care so much about something so trivial anyway. So much victim-blaming, with a hint of misogyny: if something's cared about by a group of women, how important can it be? These commenters ignore the larger issue: in the interest of saving a buck, individuals put their trust in someone else, only to be ripped off and violated. That goes beyond a niche interest.
His style is elegant and spare. But the simplicity and directness of his writing should not be taken for a lack of depth. While most crime books are almost wholly plot-driven, Indridason’s novels weave together story lines that echo and refract off one another in an almost poetic way. I think these books will stand the test of time and deserve to be read for their underlying psychological themes as well as for the satisfying resolution of the mystery. Many crime books are only fit to be read and cast aside, but Indridason’s linger in the memory, summoning the reader to return, re-read and re-think.
Preferring not to mix with us.
So what is this book all about? The publisher describes it thus:
18.Can I buy magic items? Oh, come on: how about just potions?
Joy? Always!
They declined.
Let's put aside the obvious comparisons to Washed Out and Neon Indian. Yes, you can call Casa Del Mirto 'chillwave' or 'glo-fi', but I feel the songs have a different mood, something more intimate, melancholic and familiar. Not to mention those gorgeously brilliant sounds. Casa Del Mirto is the project of Marco Ricci, from Trento. His new album, 1979, is out now on Mashhh! Records.
He is on the road to healing and doing very well. We keep his had protected and re-apply his medication a few times each day. He's such a sweetie pie. :)
Right now, how do you spend your time? A lot of people indulge in working and some waste their day through sleeping. If you belong to the type who wants to sleep a lot, then it is time to put your nothingness into use. Through investing in real estate, a person can spend at least four hours a day investing and making the most of it. There are things that people need to do especially with loved ones, that would be fine. But apart from spending time with families and friends, idle times call for much opportunity in real estate. People who are currently rich are those who seldom spend their time glued to the tube. Giving a parcel of your time to investing will bring about numerous benefits.
ambrosia
He looked up from his newspaper and said; 'Yes dear, I do. You wore that same negligee the night we were married.'
TO PREPARE THE PATTIES-
When I assembled the gallery wall around our TV one Saturday, I quickly found out that I had more frames than actual art to put in them. Fortunately, I only needed my computer and printer to remedy that.
Next Steps in Care, in collaboration with SAGE and SAGECAP, recently released a fact sheet that provides practical advice for LGBT caregivers. In addition to a checklist on important legal documents, the guide also explains how hospital discharges happen, and recommends “Do not wait for the social worker on the unit to find you. Instead, find the social worker as soon as you can.” If a caregiver and their loved one lives near a state border or spend a lot of time in two states, the guide also recommends obtaining documents for both states since civil union or domestic partner laws may not carry across state lines.
Also, it wasn’t mandatory to write anything about the bloggers I nominated..but I wanted to..
My fear of not having everything I need, or think I need, is lessened very much from how it was years ago.
When it comes to spending time with her I don't hesitate to clear my schedule.
The competition continue over the weekend as many more of Great Britain’s hopefuls continue on their path towards the Olympics.
Do you love cows? Those irresistible cows that come in all shapes and sizes....of which my favorite is the Belted Galloway. Well, if you do, you'd be in good company. My step-daughter loves cows so much that she often says "I Love Cows" randomly. She has cow purses, cow stuffed animals, cow keychains, etc and I wouldn't be surprised if she decorates her future home in a cow motif!
I excused myself and stepped into the backyard to smoke a cigarette and calm my nerves, which were crawling atop one another like beetles. The bird feeders, which my father used to always keep fully stocked, were empty. There were no birds singing or fluttering about. The world was frozen in time. I looked across the yard at the screen shelter my father used to frequent, sort of camping in his own backyard, sometimes for a night, sometimes for a full weekend, sometimes just to steal a moment or two of privacy.
As if the usual mosquito influx isn't enough, we recently removed the fish we had in the turtle tank and this morning I found a ton of mosquitoes breeding in there.
New SNP member then Alex!
November 2011
video synopsis on this adult romance ebook by: Eric S.
This project I've mentioned before, and it's still ongoing. I am up to the letter "i" now, but I already failed to leave enough space for all my patterns in some of the letters... so I'm going to have to either make *another* book, or go to the other side of the pages. These are done on a moleskine japanese fold-out book. Each letter has anywhere from 1 to 4 pages, with 15 squares on a page. Each square is just under an inch square, except the letter box, which *is* one inch.
Looks lovely, doesn't she?
12 Wall Of Sound 1:46
I've had an amazing time with Tyler and with Emily. I remember thinking many times as did activities together at home or away on an adventure such as the zoo, or hanging out at the mall, or whatever else, "It doesn't get any better than this!" I'm so privileged to have been able to stay home with my two children and raise them in this way. We've done so much together; had so many good times, and I have many treasured memories.
Byron McMackin - Drums
Ok so I’m not advocating you let your kids deliberately get hurt. But hopefully I’ll be able to let my kids be adventurous without fear. Fear is such a disabler.
Life is but an empty dream! —
I really hope that the sarcasm in my voice is coming through.
I asked Roach what he thought was up with Johnson. Is he insane; a complete and ruthless opportunist, who puts his finger to the wind and acts accordingly, his previous statements notwithstanding; or is there some third possibility I’d neglected? A third option occurred to me, and I asked Roach if Johnson had fallen in love at some point with a girl whose politics were diametrically opposed to his, and he submitted, in order to stay in her good graces?
I couldn't remember all of them offhand - and I was interested in the long list, too - so I asked if she could remind me. No, of course she couldn't. She had to look them up on the internet.
(John 5:39-40 MSG)
Well little did I know R was planning on proposing at the party in front of all of our friends and family. Everyone was in on it EXCEPT ME!
His right hand is made from rolled-up newspaper fingers taped together inside the glove. I used a coathanger wire for each finger on his left, as it needed to be bent and rigid in order to hold his jack-o-lantern bucket.
Christopher Benjamin – Colonel Hugh
EV means exposition value, is related to lighting of the scene and the sensor's iso sensitivity, in short the ev may be considered the unit of measurement of light.
Another says he was chased by a group of Asian youths who screamed insults and spat at him.
Well, yeah. According to Mike Dooley, the missing ingredient was me. It's all well and good to trust in the Universe to create abundance in our lives, but first we have to make contact, by doing what we can, with what we have, from where we are. We have to engage the magic, start the ball rolling. We have to take a baby step in the direction of our dreams. Then and only then will the Universe move to do its part, and kick in a string of inspiration and synchronicities and right-people-at-the-right-time coinkydinks to keep things flowing along.
They were the days.
There are three main reasons to keep a clean grill. The first is that a clean, well-maintained grill will have a longer useful life than a dirty, sloppy one. Grills can be expensive and it’s often less costly to maintain them than to replace them.
I did this because I was told to code, so not seeing the language I thought about the code and made my own using Donkey, Noah and Ziyi.
2) America’s Top Magazines: Still Not Hiring Women Do we really have to educate editors that women can bring new perspectives on major stories, and not just to stories about living as a single woman or going through a divorce?
This snippet of the chapter, verses 25-26, is full of riveting lessons for us. We'll examine three.
An independent (non-government controlled) Afrikaans media site called, Maroela Media, has presented a fairly truthful article today that focuses on the fact that South Africa, while a democracy, is nowhere near free (or grownup yet).
3 I Want The One I Can't Have
However, the facts clearly demonstrate that, although non-whites make up just over 10% of the population, they account for the vast majority of all victims of gang related murder and almost all the perpetrators, certainly over 90%.
Lauren says, "despite the fact that we've been inspired by song titles all year long, when i sat down to make a specifically "music influenced" card, my mind went totally blank! then i did what i always do when i'm stumped: i went foraging through my stash of vintage stuff. within five minutes i had the sheet music and a plan, within another five i had found the gorgeous victorian postcard on t'internet and printed it out. not long after that, i was done. i love it when a plan comes together!" :)
What the FBI didn’t tell us about the hotel malware threat – Do you use the internet in hotels when travelling abroad? Do you think it’s safe to do so? The FBI thinks you should be careful.. but is being surprisingly coy about the details.
After making the daily commute to the office for over 7 years to my ‘wonderful job’ as a recruitment consultant, I was offered a promotion which came with the added bonus of the chance to work from home.
Bits and pieces have filtered out of that campaign over the years but none is more telling than the testimony that on the day that John Edwards was to announce his intention to run for president, his aide, picking him up from the airport, found the mistress, Rielle Hunter, accompanying the “great man”. In the back seat of the SUV, Edwards and Hunter passed a bottle of champagne back and forth as Elizabeth Edwards awaited her husband at the event. Wow!
80's cowboy boots spray painted gold
This week was boring as shit for the most part since the TV thingy is brokey wokey 4 sum raisins and I'm only able to watch live television on it which is lames because there's mostly only paid programming on late at night. I finished Dead Island on Sunday and since then I haven't been able to think of a new game which I didn't want to buy. I have anime I could be watching but I feel like it'd be too much work to watch anything aside from Iroha or S;G. So basically the only way I can keep myself entertained right now is by either watching anime or by asking autismal as fuck "wat do" questions on farmsperg.
Sighing, Toni hung up and started to walk away. Robbie looked after her and quickly ran to stop her, tapping her on the shoulder.
The other day, mama and my sister, Kristi, came home late from church. There was an after-church luncheon that they had stayed for. Although neither of them ate. Gumbo (yuck!) and… Turtle soup. Turtle soup?! Who in their right mind would kill a poor, harmless little turtle just to make soup?! There should be a special corner of hell reserved for people who kill turtles! As if beef, poultry, pork, fish, and deer aren’t enough!! Now they have to kill turtles!! Oh, and frogs. Let’s not forget those. They’re cute and awesome too!
WALL SERVES AS A DOUBLE EDGE SWORD. MAKE GOOD USE OF IT SO AS TO STRENGTHEN, AND NOT TO WEAKEN YOURSELF.
Emergency Service cop Michael D'Alessandro carefully holds up a monstrous snake found in a Queens park yesterday.
Students, can consider taking up courses such as hospitality, tourism management, culinary or hotel management. When we choose a course to study, it is important to look for the job opportunities available, because you don’t want to spend RM70,000 and 4 years for a degree to come out and find yourself jobless.
It would appear, yet again, that Megaladon LLP does not feature in the latest Chambers & Partners directory or, indeed, The Legal 500. It is with regret, therefore, that I have to announce that our former Director of Marketing, David ‘The Airbrusher’ Cholmondely-Cameron-Smythe, was escorted from our premises at 4.30 am this morning by Megaladon LLP security operatives. I know that some of you may have found this distressing, working as you were on our new and exciting plans to set up our own outsourcing operation in the East Indies - but in these dark days of the Jackson report, credit-crunch and the ever present threat of over regulation by sundry regulators, needs must. Mr Cholmondely-Cameron-Smythe is an enthusiastic gardener, which is fortunate, because he will now have an opportunity to ‘engage’ with this interest and ‘transition’ from employment to a less stressful lifestyle.
Considered solely for the romance between Thornton and Margaret Hale, you might say it’s a more serious version of Pride and Prejudice insofar as we watch through the heroine’s eyes as she hates him at first sight and reluctantly but completely changes her mind throughout the course of the show. It’s not an easy sell. I’ve seen the series about 12 times and each time Thornton’s early brutality, as well as his strange subsequent self-revelations about his family’s past, make him an oddly moody brute of a man.
Toppings - as per your liking - I used flax seeds, cayene pepper, oregano seasoning
4 cans refrigerator cinnamon rolls
Caloric expenditure in yoga is said be anywhere from approximately 100 to 450 calories per hour, depending on the person, and the practice. According to HealthStatus.com, one hour of the following varieties of yoga performed by a 150-pound person will reap the following rewards:
as outside enters inside
They are in denial about the faults of their Work Programme.
Trim: Webster's Pages
Congrats! Both winners have been emailed and have until Friday 11th March to get back to me with their choice and mailing info so I can get their books on the way, or I'll pick new winners.
In nature we do see a law similar to natural selection. However, even in nature that law does not always reign. Happenstance, compassion, animal instinct, etc, sometimes leads to the weaker one’s triumph in a event. So we should not assume that the law of natural selection is absolute.
THE SHAMROCK TSUNAMI
And, as I look down, I realise I haven’t bothered to change out of the Lidl fleece and supermarket jeans I flung on when I walked the dog in the morning.
You turn 4 today, and soon
Three-Piece ($8-20) - there is nothing so liberating and magical as a well-tailored suit. A properly-tailored three-piece suit is the hallmark of the frontier gentleman when he is in town; some even wear 'field suits' when out on the hunt. (Note: equivalent fashionable clothing for ladies is of course available)
* constant ringing in the ears
If you try this recipe out, let me know what you think! (I didn’t tell Tyler they were healthified and I caught him going to the kitchen a few time for a brownie!
I got this kit from Scrapdango. It's mostly Simple Stories but I added my own Bazzil Basics washi tape and the staples. I cut the center of the pp and flipped it over and taped it back in. The small tape pieces are cs stickers from SS, then I cut out the title block and punched the top, inked and stapled it down, added the photos, brackets, stars (after cutting the orange one down a little), added the burlap ribbon, twisted the washi tape and stapled it down. Then finished it off with the word stickers.
Szszsz had a run of games and has made some splendid saves. He has also kept some clean sheets. I feel he needs to improve on his diving to the left hand side of his post. Ipswich’s Priskin and the Brown Haired Louie of Everton scored in that position.
So when I found out I was pregnant in April 2009, my husband and I took a hard look at our budget to see what we needed to do. Would I be able to stay home? Would I need to keep working? Both options were on the table. We figured out that if we saved every extra penny we had, cut out splurges and excessive/unnecessary spending, we could save enough for me to stay at home for one year.
I stared at the screen. What people could I tell that I hadnt already told?
ZACH: Will I feel better?
Truly I have felt like crawling in a hole for days and days. I don't want a party, in fact I'm getting my teeth cleaned this week that's how high partying is on my list. I've spent a little time wallowing, reflecting, and wondering if I'm in the right place at this monumental time in my life or not. I'm in a weird place.
To the House at quarter to one, where the new Peruvian ambassador Julio Ernesto Muñoz Deacon came to lunch. We had an excellent discussion covering a lot of ground - Peru's rapid growth; the dependence on extractive industries; the problem of water; Peru's relations with the neighbours and particularly Brazil; the problem of inequality, and President Humala's remarkable standing in the polls.
The way I see things, second person narratives have a strong emphasis on what is there to see. Strong on impression and description to immerse the reader in the world, but not to force them into a certain character mold, the second person POV is very much one that has an empty character ‘shell’ for a reader to insert themselves into, and thus allows one to experience the story as if it is happening directly to the reader. Other than obvious cues (such as getting tired when running, or a scene where you get drunk after drinking three cups of ale etc.), the reader’s experience is very much that of looking in on the world and story that the writer has created.
All because management would not give us just one more reporter – on a fixed term contract of just a year, no less – to help us out with the ridiculous workload that has meant three reporters churning out nine newspapers for our much-abused readers.
9/20 – Austin - Mark Gonzales & JB’s 90th Birthday Bash w/ American Graveyard & Freigh Train Troubadours
‘This represents a significant change in his message on women’s rights,’ she said.
Well, you can say you’re not – but you are.
And a few men talked of freedom, while England talked of ale.
Iván Meade - How would you describe your style?
It is the companion cliché to ‘No Safe level” that requires the typical Anti-Smoker drone to stick to the script, and always refer to smoking and smokers in the most derogatory terms possible. Even if they agree with some tiny portion of the smokers’ argument, they are NEVER to verbalize that support. This creates the illusion of unified, universal support for the “denormalization” of smoking and of smokers. The problem is that the “science” cited in defense of their coercion, doesn’t support their claims at all, and they know it.
As you can see, in the past I would not have done this as the red and white striped paper is entirely under the guard I can't hold it in place. Even if I was to hold it from the other side and just put the small edge under that I wanted to be cut I always found it would move. So now attaching a longer piece to the bottom opens up a whole new world.
-We had a failed international adoption and I am afraid of the bureaucracy
This week our suggested themes were: As always any piece of Photo Art - Left open to your own interpretation of Photo Art
www.Booksfromscotland.com (on the new paperback edition)
Oatmeal Walnut Cocoa Nib Cookies
2. He was always telling stories,
In response to a vision, they place a wooden cross overlooking the land. The details of where it goes, its dimensions etc. are quite specifically prophetically confirmed. There are stories of people experiencing freedom, reconciliation, healing, hearing from God – all just in the presence of the cross (well God, using the symbol). This one was really intriguing…
There are aspects of my life that could be better,
Boom! The clouds collide
Libya said Senussi is under investigation for crimes which it says took place during 2011, such as the shooting of captured rebels who were no longer able to fight.
And here's the blog post by Josin.
Carrie heard this passively. The peculiar state which she was in made it sound like the welcome breath of an open door.
101. One important key to success is self-confidence. An important key to self-confidence is preparation. – Arthur Ashe
This is a story about spring, baseball and the first wonderful and crazy argument of the new year. Baseball, I think, is the best argument game we have going. Sure, in other sports you can argue Tiger vs. Jack or Sampras vs. Federer or Montana vs. Unitas or whatever. But after a while it kind of fizzles out. You don't really hear people arguing about who was the best pulling guard in NFL history or who was the best on-the-ball defender in the NBA. But I've had an argument going with a friend about whether Cory Snyder or Jesse Barfield had a stronger arm for about 10 years. And every year, right around this time, when the trees start to show a little color, when light starts to last into the early evening, we fight about it again.
As an ex-bullied person, the worst thing you can do is shut yourself away. Staying at home and avoiding people allows your fears to go unchallenged and for your confidence to stay low. How do you know whether people out there are good and friendly if you don’t go out and give them a chance? Even going for a walk on your own can lighten your mood and help you feel more in touch with the outside world. Get in touch with friends, go out for a meal or to the cinema. Interacting with people will build your confidence and take your mind off your worries. It will also give you a more healthy and balanced outlook on the world: it’s not as scary as you might think and there’s a lot of good things to get involved in.
Please don't send just photos, we need to see the individual BLOG POSTS
1-2 tbsp olive oil
"There's no need to be like that, Rel." Dora's manner had stiffened, but only slightly. Behind her, Taslin stared at him with outright alarm on her face. Dora's tone was reproachful rather than angry as she finished, "It's just a joke."
Choose to trust Jesus with everything. Don’t compartmentalize your faith. Instead, decide to trust Jesus with every part of your life – from your relationships to your work. In prayer, give Jesus all of your needs, desires, fears, hopes, and dreams, trusting Him to handle your concerns and work to give you what’s best. This will free you from the pressure of trying to make things work out yourself in the ways you want and the frustration of hitting the limits of your own power to control your life.
It would suck, but that would be that. There wouldn’t be anything we could do.
Many in the news media are prepared with specials already crafted that
Naturally, the government will argue that, by taking such powers, it is protecting our freedoms in the ‘war against terror’. As I understand it, the ‘war against terror’ is designed to protect our freedoms from those who oppose them, primarily ‘Al Qaeda’, which may or may not exist as the government portrays it. It is not the first time this country has made a collective stand against something which threatens our freedoms, but the governments approach is novel, to say the least. In order to protect those freedoms, it is steadily eroding them: this would have been akin to fighting communism in the Cold War by becoming a Soviet Republic, or fighting Fascism by becoming fascist.
It is very hard not to go completely mental in here. Maybe it is the heat of the greenhouse or the crushing scents of herbs and flowers you haven’t smelled all winter but I always leave with a carload of stuff.
If you have legal moonshine on your hands, you have been conned. But perhaps you already knew that when you plunked down your money at the liquor store. Did you use a debit card? Was it a state store? Well, honey, pack your bags: we're going to Disneyland.
with her broom, she swept the memories
“Look at their reserve, their calm,” muses the Brit. “They must be British.”
I cleaned, I cooked, I exercised, I organised, I worked, I played, I relaxed.
Download the entire album here. But be forewarned - some of these tracks begin as pompous spoken word crap, but, given time, they turn into pretty good pop songs. Enjoy!
The full list of award winners is below:
Lovelies, once again my computer is broken, so let me see what I can post for you in the mean time. I really meant to take pictures of what I could, crafting-wise, this weekend--but I promise to catch up on that next weekend.
Please check out their blogs and discover MORE art of these talented ladies!!
Take the pastry out of the oven, remove the foil or paper with the beans, and put the pastry back in again for about 5 minutes to get the pastry a bit more brown/ yellow.
Bouillon*****
Renfield (Dwight Frye) is an English attorney travelling to Transylvania to finalize the sale of Carfax Abbey in London to the mysterious Count Dracula (Lugosi). The next evening, Renfield is on a boat bound back to London. When the boat arrives, the entire crew is dead and Renfield is a maniacally laughing lunatic. He is committed to the sanitarium of Dr. Seward (Herbert Bunston), which is adjacent to Carfax Abbey. Dracula introduces himself to Seward, Seward’s daughter Mina (Helen Chandler), Mina’s fiancé John (David Manners), and Mina’s friend Lucy (Frances Dade). Lucy becomes quite taken the exotic Count. Then she winds up dead, drained of blood. Now Mina seems to be inexplicably drawn to the Count… Only Professor Abraham Van Helsing (Edward Van Sloan) seems to know that Dracula is a vampire, and responsible for Lucy’s death. Now John and Dr. Seward need his help to keep Mina from suffering the same fate.
GLAMCOR considers skin primer the most critical step in the makeup application process. Our formula is designed to be the highest performing primer in the industry.
Kajang Country Heights, where they operated, seemed the perfect guise for the syndicate since the area is home to several ministers and former Cabinet members.
I swore I would never buy another thing from Amazon.com and I haven't...until today.
Maria & Derek – 4
Drowsy and lightly damp.
THIS BEAUTIFUL LIFE. By Helen Schulman. (Harper/HarperCollins, $24.99.) A family’s Manhattan life comes apart when their 15-year-old forwards a sexually explicit video made for him, unsolicited, by a girl two years younger.
I owe an explanation to whoever happens to click on this blog and find out that last post was dated september 2011.
This small though not barren spot, Iona, Hy, or Columbkill, only two miles in length and one mile in breadth, has been distinguished – 1. By the monastery of St. Columba, founded A.D. 566, whose abbot exercised an extraordinary jurisdiction over the bishops of Caledonia- 2. By a classic library, which afforded some hopes of an entire Livy; and, 3. By the tombs of sixty kings, Scots, Irish, and Norwegians, who reposed in holy ground. See Usher (p.311, 360-370) and Buchanan (Rer. Scot. 1. ii. p. 15, edit. Ruddiman).
That does beg the question of why the planets have their various colors.
So, if I’m going to name a child after a character in a fantasy novel, Shakespeare seemed like the safest way to go. There won’t be any horrifying moment of discovery when my child realizes, “What? You named me after the hero in a pulp fiction sword and sorcery novel with tacky cover art?” * Miranda is literate and intellectual and only secretly geeky if you want it to be. And it’s beautiful, unusual, and may be shortened to a nickname without unfortunate effect.
I took the scraps and made this princess bag. You can wear it over the shoulder or as a wristlet. It has leather trim to protect the bottom of the bag and I made a matching key fob.
In the novel, it happens. Suddenly. And people die. Those who don't are struggling to survive. As I said, it's a gripping story. Do I recommend it? Oh, yeah! Because it's happening. Yesterday's news report says a huge ice sheet, three times the area of Manhattan, has broken from a Greenland glacier.
In 1959, Hartmann became co-editor of the Schott magazine Neue Zeitschrift für Musik, in spite of his numerous obligations and commissions. The world premier of his last completed commission, the 8. Symphonie, took place 1963 in Cologne. It excels not only in the comparative shortness and reduction of statement, but also in a delight for sound experiments, which was until then unprecedented in Hartmann’s works. The two movements of this work, Cantilène and Dithyrambe Scherzo-Fuga, are merged with a seamless transition and have the same thematic material. Despite their contrasting character, both movements show a preference for imitation and the principle of continuous variation. The last movement with elements from scherzo, fugue and finale, based on the same material, gives the impression of a merging synopsis of all of Hartmann’s symphonic works. After the completion of the 8. Symphony, Hartmann turned towards the opera again, after having rejected numerous attempts. In 1960-61, he contributed the middle movement Ghetto to the cycle Jüdische Chronik, a joint work with Henze, Blacher, Dessau and Wagner-Régency. It was a threnody to the last hours of the Warsaw ghetto.
And lay knowing that's where I belong
The Cramps: Green Fuz
“Don’t talk to me like a little baby! Mom is still in this house!”
6. Saute onions and garlic in a pan with a small amount of vegetable broth until tender (add more broth if needed)
Now, I didn’t eat good today. The only think that I ate today was my left over Apple Bee’s Blackened Chicken Penne (1/2 order 655 calories), 1/2 of bread (140 calories), and 2 Mozzarella sticks (207 calories). My total calories today was 1002 calories today. I guess it’s a good thing I haven’t eaten anything today. But I swear Adipex really has been suppressing my appetite. But I don’t think I will be 15 lbs lighter when I weigh in this week. I’m going to cry if I’m not, but clearly it’s my fault. I haven’t been eating like I should have and I’ve been letting a lot of stress get to me lately too. And I clearly know that’s not healthy. I only drank about 3 bottles of water. But I know that I will get back on my 8 bottles of water of day. I’m almost fully stock. I want to go back and get one more case since I have the $3 off coupon. I could get some Marsh water since it’s $2.99 but pay $.99 for a 24 pack of Dasani isn’t bad at all.
Thank you for this weekend. Thank you for twenty years ago. Thank you for remembering with us. Thank you for being extraordinary.
My hope it that when you walk into whatever studio is yours~
I'm Amy.
Looking closely at the typography of both the original cover and the “title” of the Errata Edition furthers my feelings of space-time disruption. Adding to the weirdness is the slight-but-noticeable rise and fall in the hand-set letters of THE MUSUEM OF MODERN ART on the original’s cover, versus the flawless, digitally set straightness of the title lying just below.
I can find no current info. online about the situation, but this is probably another building that will be lost to time, to circumstance, and from what I've read, perhaps a little bit of greed on the part of the property owner. He would rather tear the barn down than to simply give it to the town.
Discard, release and F L O W...
I caught glimpses of the disciples’ faces as I imagine them to look. Seeking them out, dispersed among the crowd, I saw their pain and confusion. Suddenly, it was all careening out of control, going way too fast. He had warned them, but they hadn’t understood. Still didn’t. They could only watch and hope that somehow this was all going to end well. I wish I could tell them what I know of these familiar, far away events.
This is a post dedicated to the UAE and people of Emirates, its a positive post highlighting the positives of this country and the indescribable achievements, and its being posted as a positive reply to many many negative and inconsiderate comments by bloggers, and non bloggers that have either visited the country, ive currently heard dubai being described as dirty, fake, and a city with no culture.Let me tell you the truth about Dubai and the UAE.
David Loving-Molloy / Three recent poems / 67
We have an AMAZING new sponsor this week - CARE2STAMP. Care2Stamp is a new store based out of Canada, selling a variety of stamp lines and Copic markers, paper and refills. The stamp companies that Kim sells are CC Designs, Wild Rose Studio, Your Next Stamp, Popcorn Bear, Whimsy Stamps, AND SEI papers!!! GREAT selection, please go check it out & tell Kim that we sent you!!!!
So, what have I been getting at?
Here’s a few pics of Saturday’s sunny 9 miler…
But that’s where our similarities as fans end.
It is a similar situation that we find ourselves when we offer free downloads on our work and ask only that the receiver of our hard work take the time to merely type several letters in a comment box. It makes the world of difference to our future developement, and very little to the receiver.
Yes, no matter what they have done or not done, nothing can convince Hougang residents to vote otherwise.
I made an album for a friend with some lovely professional photos she had done. Used white cardstock base and scraps of paper and bits and pieces. She loved it and I loved CREATING AND GIVING it!
Menu (I've included links to some of the recipes/posts)
By BRADY BAUMAN
Tea leaves typically go through a series of steps before they are ready to be sold in shops. Leaves are wilted, either under sun or a temperature controlled oven. Then, they are bruised slightly to enable exposure to air and thus, oxidation. After the level of oxidation desired is reached, the leaves go through a process of fixation to stop oxidation. Lastly, it is dried and packed. While this is typical, many teas go through special intermediate processes that give a particular tea its unique characteristics and they vary from tea to tea.
Dora’s Big Birthday Adventure guest-stars the voices of Rosie Perez as the witch, John Leguizamo as the flying monkeys, and Hector Elizondo as the wishing wizzle. The final installment of the Magic Storybook Trilogy, Dora and Boots find their way home for Dora’s birthday party where all of her family and friends are waiting to celebrate with her.
I imagine the Duke and Duchess celebrated a quiet first anniversary, recalling their vows made one year ago today. I like to think the sentiments expressed between themselves echo this timeless verse:
around the pen, his bitten cuticles,
The detritus and the dross each morning,
Informed sources say that the Russians have warned of "unpredictable consequences" in the event Iran is attacked, with some Russians saying that the Russian military will take part in the possible war because it would threaten its vital interests in the region.
Arduino community has done great thing in creating OneWire-library, but it partly lacks some documentation, and the use of SignBit was not implemented in the example code what came with OneWire library. The SignBit tells if the measured value is negative or not. This was
Guess what? I did a shitty job welding two intake manifolds. I had built a test manifold before this one, to get all my angles and dimensions correct. So I grabbed it out of the bin, and bolted everything back up. Salty fired on the first kick, and ran great for about 2 minutes, holding a perfect idle and taking throttle. Then I heard it stumble and saw a puff from the same exact location! What the hell. I think I'm just cracking what little weld is there as I tighten the nuts to secure it to the head. Two manifolds down. But at least I maybe found my mystery problem?
Farms contribute more in taxes than they require in services, whereas suburban development costs more than it generates in taxes, according to several studies. On average, for every $1 in revenue raised by residential development, governments must spend $1.17 on services, thus requiring higher taxes of all taxpayers. For each dollar of revenue raised by farm, forest, or open space, governments spend 34 cents on services.
On the bright side, for having only two tables, I did leave the restaurant with $85, some chocolate, and a hand-blown glass sea turtle ornament. One of the guys at my party was showing his co-worker a gorgeous glass sea turtle ornament he had made. I commented on how pretty it was, how impressed I was that he had made it, and that I sort of had a "thing" for turtles. At the end of their meal, our maitre^d came up to me and said "Merry Christmas." The guy gave me the ornament! Luckily, he was still there, so I was able to thank him profusely, and he told me about the gallery he represents. The group also left me a little wrapped chocolate because "I probably don't get 'treated' very often."
1 token
This book is a hilariously funny guide through pregnancy- seriously had me wetting my pants while I was reading it (well either it was that funny or I had that leaky bladder thing she was talking about...hmm). It is definitely something dads and mums-to-be have to read. My hubby and I read through it week by week each pregnancy and laughed and laughed.
The global demand for palm oil is not easing.
for emulation proud
When I refer to the corporate data dictionary, I am referring to the Passive Data Dictionary which acts like the bible for data modellers, designers and BI analysts. Someone who is a subject matter expert (SME) should contribute to the passive data dictionary which serves as a centralized repository of information about the data as it means to the business, relationships, formats, usage and interpretation.
Utensils
Best of all for your child, IXL Math questions have real-world application. As kids learn to excel in math, they also learn to excel in life. So when it’s time to make change at the ice cream truck this summer or decide which coupon gets them a cheaper ticket to the water park,
Cheers to all of us thieves!
Before serving, check it for seasonings. When you mix it with the pasta you can also add in a tablespoon of butter (or leave it out if that sounds like too much–I’m a sucker for enriching butter).
Week 3: Developing Your Brand
A great coach…knows his or her subject thoroughly…
Esther’s servants tell Esther of this, and Mordecai sends Esther a copy of the decree:
This being said; I need to know...
Much thanks to Losers with Socks for the picture as well as the idea that eventually lead to this post. Stay tuned to LSW for more straight shootin’, flagellatin’ recruitin’ talk in the coming weeks. Err, coming nineteen years.
For afters, we have the following books, all of which I saw at Target yesterday and thought, I should read that. But I already own them. Bargain! They join the TBR pile:
“Nowadays most people die of a sort of creeping common sense, and discover when it is too late that the only things one never regrets are one's mistakes.”
baseboard/kick board
If you are blonde, red-haired or just fair skinned and live anywhere that the sun shines , at any time ... start wearing sunblock.
Bruce E. Levine is a clinical psychologist and author of Get Up, Stand Up: Uniting Populists, Energizing the Defeated, and Battling the Corporate Elite (Chelsea Green, 2011).
2) there are no thermal effects in Io more significant than those produced by the
Expensive cars at that: Bugattis,
There has been talk of a certain lack of heft. Does he have the girth, the weight, the basic star-spunk for the job? “Yes well, I’d submit that Inter wasn’t exactly that easy when it comes to scrutiny,” Hodgson mumbled, if not quite pointedly, then with a prickle of pride.
They’re good questions. And depending whom you ask, the answers vary.
I had to get creative with dinner the other night.
-The ULTIMATE PET RESORT Application-
Creative & Cultural Skills, Arts Council England and Nesta have joined forces to commission new independent research into the influence of the theatre industry on the wider economy, with a view to gaining a greater understanding of the role of public investment in the arts.
And as long as nobody notices that I feel dead on the inside.
Then there are the corners – where the skaters build momentum for the coming straightaway – and the cement ledges are jam-packed with rowdy and excited fans. They keep the excitement going in the building, starting waves and cheers and belting out “Sweet Caroline” or “Head and Shoulders, Knees and Toes” (hand movements and all) at the tops of their lungs, almost loud enough to drown out the accompanying oompah band. Those fans aren’t there just to watch a skating meet, or to cheer on their favorites, or see who will win; they’re there to have FUN.
I’m currently living in Davis. The house is surrounded by nature, while to the city it’s a bike ride of merely three minutes. And the best part: Around this place there are a bunch of orange and grapefruit trees. Recently, while I was waiting for someone, I collected two of these grapefruits and put them on this orange-colored chair. I don’t know what made me do that. It was most likely a mixture of boredom and curiosity about how this combination of colors would look on a picture. So here my first-ever arranged pictures.
Okay, hitting the flea market with my sis again tomorrow, so I better head for bed so I'm rest up for the hunt. lol
Carlos Ferraz is regularly in demand with top celebrities including Anna Paquin, Cameron Diaz, Kate Hudson, Daniel Craig and Orlando Bloom, and has worked for a wide range of brands, editorial and red carpet events. His breadth of work includes shoots with photographers such as Annie Leibovitz, Terry o’Neill, and Uli Webber.
Millie will get her grad degree in November – don’t know what’s next for her.
But Muck and Finn were taking no chances. Muck said, “There’s only one thing to do!” He backed Maud across to the far side of the gravel highway.
Life is full of low beams. Remember to stoop.
There has been no study since which has shown significantly different results, and demonstrated anyone’s ability to consistently achieve the claims of TT in a true blinded test, let alone actually curing anyone. (If you think I’m wrong, send me a link to where it’s happened.) And until we have some similar, legitimate evidence that the proposed mechanisms of therapeutic touch are the most likely cause of what’s going on – ruling out all the usual bad reasons why people buy into alternative medicine, on the basis of multiple anecdotes or personal experience and so on – there’s simply no reason it should be believed.
He was six foot four and full of muscles
When a booking problem led us to spend a couple of nights in a more remote place, we looked through the gazillion take-out menus in the kitchen only to find that the few vegetarian options that existed were all deep-fried and unhealthy. Then we found a menu for a place called Mellow Mushroom and their food seemed somewhat healthier (sprouts were involved). However, as I read through the menu, the only sandwich that seemed a good option was the “Portobello and Cheese Hoagie - a grilled Portobello mushroom cap big enough to fit on your head basted by garlic butter accompanied by artichoke hearts, sun-dried tomatoes, spinach, and Feta. Garnished with sprouts.”
The newspaper also said police had arrested four individuals, including the buyer, the seller and air force personnel who assisted in stealing the engine, used as powerplant for a single-seat fighter and reconnaissance aircraft.
The song is sung by the wonderful Katie Doherty who is an award winning musician and composer.
Anyway, I’d seen a lot of porn in my day already, so I just mimicked what I’d seen there. I went fast for a while, slow for a while, deep for a while, shallow for a while, to the right side, then to the left side, and I played with her clit with one of my hands. Gary Allen’s Nothing On But the Radio serenaded us from the radio as we had sex. I could see a clock from my position on the bed, and I know this is the big question everyone is wondering: we started at 11:17 and ended at 11:24. Seven minutes. The first time I had sex lasted seven minutes. Go me!
Third is "Down to Earth!", this issue's Vampirella story, by Mike Royer (art) and Forrest Ackerman (story). This story is notable for being the only instance where an issue had a Vampirella story but it did not lead off the issue. The story also features Vampirella's twin sister Draculina, in her sole appearance, who acts as host. This story features Vampirella trying out for a Monsterella contest at the Warren offices where she is selected the winner by James Warren and Forrest Ackerman, giving her the name Bambi Aurora. Traveling on a plane to Hollywood, a bolt of lightning strikes it, blowing it up. An absolutely horrific story with a ridiculous ending, this is probably the worst Vampirella story of all time. Thankfully this would be the last time Royer or Ackerman did a Vampirella story and she wouldn't start in a story again until issue 8.
Not sure if I've told you all, but I've actually gone down in weight and inches since finding out I was moving- I guess that's what being busy does to ya! I'm SO proud of myself for staying FAR, far away from JUNK! I'm finally at that point where if I eat anything that isn't good and healthy for me, I wanna vomit immediately. FINALLY! ;) Now, that's not to say I don't like sweets and salties, but trust me- I'd much rather eat chicken and broccoli.
All of the (many, many, many) flowers from the funeral had been brought into the room and two women were busy in a corner stripping all the petals and placing them into a basket near the head of the casket. As the main woman sang that unearthly song, everyone in the room stood up and began to file past the body in a circle, picking up a handful of petals out of the basket each time they passed and sprinkling them over him as they whispered their final good-byes.
Have an awesome rest of your day and enjoy the unexpected!
18. Thomas Browne "Religio Medici" (don't ask)
Canning Granny is celebrating achieving over 1,000 (count them... one thousand!) Facebook "Likes" (I'm not sure why they changed "Fans" to "Likes"... fans sounded so much more... well... "fannish!" but I digress)...
A scratch off lottery ticket (yes I checked. It was a loser)
And then my cousins got a Power Wheels jeep.
Only happened once...lol but it did. I don't usually run outside. As an adult that is I have only ran on a treadmill. I thought just going for a job around the Roman Forum would be no problem as our hotel was just a block away. RIGHT! Cobblestones, pebbles, dodging nuns and priests and unfamiliar territory were all big obstacles. I walked mostly but some running did happen, just not as much as I would have liked. We did tours and walked everywhere so exercise was not an issue. My friend was wearing a pedometer. In all we walked 20 miles while we were gone. Not bad at all. The food was amazing as I knew it would be. With all of the great food and gelato every night while in Rome I knew I had gained. I jumped on the scale this morning and weighed 181.4 which is a loss of almost 2 pounds from my weight of 183 when I left. I was shocked and over joyed! I want to thank everyone for their kind and encouraging words on my last posts. As always you guys are awesome!
Not only is it buy on get one free, but the original price is slashed in half so if you buy 2 quarts you’re only paying $40, instead of $160! That’s a savings of $120!!!!
An interactive workshop with Zoe Blunt on grassroots strategies to shut down tar
Lo presento il signore....
From reading and listening to high quality material, Plantinga concludes, the preacher, and the writer, I might add, can absorb “excellent language, even if unconsciously. He’s like an articulate child from a family of articulate speakers.” May we train our minds and ears, and our students’, so we can write like that.
We're seeing the high school tomorrow for Feylin and I've also discovered there's an organization in Scottburgh that offers extra tutoring lessons for kids of all grades, so we'll be looking into that to help her with any gaps she will have.
He looks in the mirror
This is the CD Box that I used.
Divorce is a common occurrence and half of the people who stay together are just going through the motions anyway.
To be a professional dancer in the US is to be treated as a unique individual. In other places I have experience d what it is like to be excluded for being different, here, if you work hard, you will be rewarded. The level of effort is always rewarded as such.
We have developed speed but we have shut ourselves in:
So, I made them three different ways, and to tell you the truth, all were delicious!
In the end, I think that While He Was Away accomplished exactly what it set out to do: tell a real-life story of love and war and the people who are most deeply affected by both. And something about this book definitely affected me personally, because it was raw and real, and it didn't try too hard to make an impression or be overly-dramatic. Honestly, it didn't have to-- the story was just that good, and the characters were just that relatable. I would recommend this book to all my readers, because it was realistic, genuine and heartfelt with a wonderful message that can't help but encourage and inspire you. And really, that's about everything I could ask for in a book!
“Water.”
3) They sand about what God had done (and was going to do!)
01. Shine On You Crazy Diamond 26:53
1 accomplish
“Yep. They have to live in my tummy.” And he popped the last one in his mouth.
I came across this design on Pinterest last week, and when clicking over to see the resource I was taken to Houzz, where someone suggested this lamp might have been made from a 1940's vase. What a fantastic idea, if you can't find just the right lamp, how about looking for a vase and put your DIY skills to work! (Or find a great lamp shop to work with like Naomi's here in Portland.)
Highlight up to three of your top priority goals you would like to achieve in the next 1 year, then do the same for the next 3-5 years and then the next 10 years. So you should have about 9 goals to achieve in the next decade with enough clarity to paint a good picture of life on your terms. Even if you don’t think or know how you will achieve them, highlight them anyway.
The two were first mistaken for "partners" (and I'm not talking "lab"), and then they decided to race to see who could "GET ER DONE" in the "bag-o-blood-fill-er-up-fastest" competition. (There's a timer on the blood drawing machine). I was rooting for Melisa (sorry Weasel - I shoulda known!), but Weasel beat her by SIX SECONDS!
This exists co-morbidly with my virulent proclivity to run away from challenges.
dos círculos que forman el cuerpo.
The problem is that I don’t like to be told what to do. The good news is that the plot plan isn’t that strict. The scenes are loosely constructed and the order is not final. Shuffling the order of the scenes is a constant option.
Here is my creation for the Belli Challenge. The theme is a recipe, and the recipe is as follows: 1 - Ribbon, 2- Designer Papers, 3 - Colors and 4 - Gems/Pearls. The recipe must be followed as listed.
And there are always things to be sorry about,
I know I will still worry over the missing spoon. As I am mostly a twat like that.
It blends the colour in at the same time of application so is very quick. However, due to its size, it gives me a larger area of blush than I prefer, as a result of this I find I am using this more for powder and bronzer.
*gives the Blogger logo an evil stare*
The park gets limited light because it is a small park surrounded by buildings. It gets even less light than another similarly sized park might get because the buildings immediately abut the park rather than being set apart by streets and sidewalks as is normally the case.
Ephesians 1:18-23
* Even as an adult reader, I empathised completely with how the separation of her parents affected Phoebe and how it culminated in an almost crippling shyness – something I experienced myself at that age. Do you hope that both parents and children could gain something from reading about this kind of situation? Did a real-life experience of this situation help inspire the book?
First, in low, null, and WH space, miners already have to take defensive precautions every day. Hulkageddon in null sec, for example, is pretty much a non-event.
- He certainly a happy man now.
After leaving the UK X Factor, Cheryl went on to be a judge for X Factor USA, but plans changed when Simon humiliatingly axed her and replaced her with Nicole Scherzinger.
Good thing is, I own all of these already....so I can build up my supply for the 2nd half of the year. Wish we me luck...looking forward to sharing with you what I learn!
The black skinny jeans by Levi are also a great item most men should have in their collection. These jeans can be worn in a causal style during the day, and then be styled to create a chic evening look. They retail for $50
Coloring Pages
Where is the waxing and the waning of womb and wild?
which I love
Of cause I also tried the Aurica yarn, but this stitch is a bit too complex to use with only the aurica if you want even results. Detached stitches work better than rows. I tried making rows of stitches, but it was so bad I ripped it up.
Skepoet What, if any, changes have you seen in the make-up of people attending
In her classic book, Words that Hurt, Words that Heal, Carole Mayhall says: "I am convinced that daily, perhaps hourly, we need to ask God to help us bite our tongue before voicing careless remarks that can hurt, even devastate. We need to ask him to help us think before we speak."
The BBC World News spokesman said:
The section on illnesses and first aid reminds one how risky travel could be without modern antibiotics and other medical procedures. Snake bites, rabid dogs, cholera and dysentery are all mentioned. Young children were particularly vulnerable, and they advise vaccination whenever possible, and careful supervision of ayahs (nursemaids). The recipes are mostly English, or adaptations of English food, rather than Indian, although chutneys and curried vegetables do appear.
Only three more episodes to go, Justifans, and it looks like some fun shit is coming down the pike.
-$1/20 Purina Friskies or Friskies Pouch, (SS 05/01/11 #2)
I am going to Canada. To London Ontario to be exact. I will tell them there all about a project that I alluded to in my last post.
Can’t wait to see you there … this is going to be incredible!
The two of them arrive around 1pm, just as lunch is being served. Proud mommy Janika tells everyone, she's got a tooth! Her first tooth!
The movie actually has a lot more to do with "this current age" than it does with anything that happened in the Fifth Century. Prothero has certainly bought the message of its fable. It's another manifestation of the old "Conflict Thesis" that seems to be reinforced by the actual, very modern, conflict between reactionary fundamentalist Biblical literalists and modern science. For Prothero, as for many people without a good grasp of the history of science, if (some) religious types are opposed to proper science today then it makes sense that they must have always done so. Therefore he likes the fact that this is being reinforced by Amenábar's movie and is oblivious to the fact that Amenábar has had to distort history to get it to conform to the "Conflict" model.
Austin - 13
7. Citrus and citrus juice – I use lemons in a lot of cooking as well, especially for vegetables. I think the juice and zest gives everything just enough sour and a good bite in chicken dishes, and can even be made nice and sweet if used with sugar like lemon meringue pie, so it’s pretty versatile too. Same with the oranges. Orange juice always in my house.
sobieski vodka, meyer lemon & blood orange house sour, ginger beer
Here is the picture of her that I took when she was ready to get on the court
There are a few places that sold Chee Cheong Fun in this town, mainly along Jalan Ah Cheong and its branches. I had mine at the Glutton Square and it costs RM 3.20 a plate.
Joe's Apartment: This is an MTV movie, and is hilariously bad. Yes, it was funny. Yes, it was stupid. We laughed a lot, but often while cringing. Joe moves to the big city, and everything goes wrong. The roaches in his apartment can talk, and they decide that they like Joe, and want to help him out. It's all about Joe trying to get the perfect girl...with cockroach commentary and songs. Weird. I know.
As we clung to each other, tenderly smooching outside the decidedly un-romantic airport security checkpoint, I felt like I was having an out of body experience when GDA breathed, Wait for me.
in dispatch, packing stickers into envelopes. I couldn't believe this, I'd just graduated from
SO……………..
Other students that day wore red, white and green in favor of their pride for the Mexican holiday, which marks the Mexican army's victory over the French in the Battle of Puebla on May 5, 1862.
Yet, despite all this, I could not put the book down. There are three major reasons for this:
The rest of the numbers hold few surprises either–Juliet’s a cold fish; Keamy’s friggin terrifying; Smokey’s a monster, literally; Sawyer’s a badass, and Eko too. The beard cutting thing, though, that was a little weird.
The American culture wars began earlier, back in the 1960s, with young liberals angry at the suffering in Vietnam and the injustice still experienced by African-Americans. But when some of them adopted a style that was anti-American, anti-authority and anti-puritanical, conservatives saw their most sacred values desecrated and they counter-attacked.
But it’s not so difficult to get out and honour yourself and your Gods by quiet actions in the world. An allotment or orchard project to bring pleasure to others and food to your family. Litter-picking as you take the dog for a walk, or the kids to school. Even volunteering to help your local space, be it Neighbourhood Watch, local environmental groups or charity work. Consider how best to connect your faith to your life, and do it. Take responsibility, rise to a self-imposed challenge. Be adventurous, explore – find your own quest!
David: Bucharest, Romania
And here are two more minor reasons why I created a blog. One is that we created a charity and we wanted it to be introduced to the world. It’s called The Healthy Kidchen. The Healthy Kidchen is a charity that feeds kids. My family started in a public school. And until now, we kept feeding a class of 50-Grade 2 students. The other reason is that I wanted to inspire kids to bake.
7:00 a.m. Wake up because you told your body to wake up early so you could get to the gym. Say Are you kidding me? and go back to sleep.
2/3 cups dried yellow split peas, rinsed and picked over
Hair becomes coarse and dry, breaking, brittle, falling out
Grandma Rachel looked irritable. "Yes, the letter that's floating right next-- Oh. Well, I always forget this part." She snapped her fingers, and a letter appeared on my lap. "That one."
They have studied you, Mr. and Mrs. America, and they know your weaknesses well.
When the relatives of Samson brought him bound to the enemy they thought his destiny was over, but then the Almighty God has a purpose for the life of Samson and God saw to it that the plan of the enemy to truncate the destiny of Samson was foiled. I have always said it nobody comes to this world without a reason.
vile little Worts walks ahead of them spouting an
Espresso syrup
Oh I am so happy I was sitting there on a warm winter afternoon.
Alas, I was neither of those things and, while enthusiastic for the game, I was not very good at teaching its rules to others. Add to it that I didn't have a "proper" board and it's little wonder I never got the chance to play many games of dragonchess. Nowadays, I look back on my efforts with more than a little embarrassment -- the follies of youth! One of several that this issue of Dragon brings to memory.
- Whah thah than? - Asks Party Time.
If you haven't already, sign up the The Digi Street Newsletter here and you'll receive a confirmation email with a link to download this hi-resolution file in SVG, JPG & PNG file format. A "Read Me" file will also be attached explaining the terms of use. Please read and follow those terms.
For our walk yesterday, I handed Noah the cell phone and let him take photos (most of these are his)... It was fun to see what he thought was worthy of snapping. He said he LOVED taking pictures. Time to get this kid his own real camera, I think!
The situation may have changed by the time I am able to make my dream into reality, or life may simply take me into a different direction. But for now, I am taking this idea from my "Daydreams" box and filing it under "Future Plans."
Of nothing may this be more true than of books. CS Lewis once said that a story worth reading at the age of 10 will also be worth rereading at the age of 50. In that later venture, it is our prior selves, as well as the text, that we reread. And what we find is how deeply, at all stages, it has been reading us.
Provide project engineering input/output, as required, in the bid stage regarding design and engineering scheduling.
Luckily (or perhaps not) and unsurprisingly, I found the story also on the Guardian whose headline reads “Co-op boycotts exports from Israel’s West Bank settlements”, with the sub-heading “UK’s largest mutual takes lead among European supermarkets” – as if the boycott is a good thing that should be emulated by European shops.
4. - 6. Jerry Garcia
If failing would be boring or kill the story, make the target number very low or just let it happen.
But that's not a fair evaluation -- you know why? Because the guy who told me that knows at the outset that no one's going to say that they were pursuing publication when they were ten. It's a set-up.
Please spread this message to everyone you know, far and wide. The time is short.
On the edge of my seat, let me tell ya!!! Next Wednesday might bring us closer to maybe understanding what the hell is going on here... Or maybe not just yet! Who knows...
In May 1929 Georgia O'Keeffe visited New Mexico for the first time, and was immediately taken in hand by Mabel Dodge, who lent her a studio and a base from which to explore the surrounding country. O'Keeffe was already famous, both for her flower paintings and as a doyenne of the New York art scene; her husband Alfred Stieglitz was a mover and a shaker who helped her become one of the most prominent and highly-paid artists of her time.
"I lost my sekend tooth when I was eating my brekfast this morning"
So, why don't you call in at the blog tomorrow, we'd love you to join in the fun. I'll also be showing you the details of my project for the challenge on here tomorrow.
I am determined to, as Mish puts it, make that change permanent. This is what I am giving myself this round. Yet more importantly, I want to give, not only myself, but my family the gift of a life that is active and healthy. I want weekends filled with bike rides, runs, outdoor fitness, swimming to be part of my girl’s childhood memories. I owe that to her. This realization has further strengthened my resolve.
I could write an entire post about the issues of trying to find a good rocking/glider chair for a nursery! Anything affordable is cheap in quality and anything of standard quality is expensive. Baby furniture is a lucrative business...
Sometime later Olivia awoke to find a hand on her thigh. It was Andy. “What’s up precious?”
Dear My Dream Publisher Of Good Humor,
Jesus knew his spiritual journey depended upon responsiveness to God’s invitations. Although his job was the most crucial in human history, Jesus did not get compulsive, preoccupied or unable to practice the presence of God or people. In the midst of interruptions and overwhelming need, Jesus learned how to discern between invitations. – Pg. 18
Talked to Bob in Metairie. They lost power but no other significant events. They have the generator running and are doing fine.
First off, most of the fruits and veggies I want to grow need warmth. The house is kept in the mid-60′s range, so a lot of container plants wouldn’t thrive if left randomly hanging about. And sunlight is inconsistent for growing indoors, especially if windows are partially blocked by trees or don’t face south.
As I walked by her, I expected her to say something to me about my rude children, but she didn't. I said "excuse me; sorry" and kept going and she didn't say anything.
Happy Feet3 APL turned one. 43 food post, 30,000 views and huge bunch of wonderful people feels like a winner! Thanks to my lens, made a self check with my earlier posts, was shocked to see the date. It was a dubious start, but the journey so far has been glorious. APL has been a platform for me to connect with all you lovely people out here, without you guys, trust me she wouldn't have reached here. You all have been a part my joy, understanding my thoughts, encouraging me for both (blog and PhD) and top most all the love. Big THANKS to all of you, keep us loved! Would like to be more regular in posting to keep the visual treat on, you already know why, will try my best this year.
After the war he moved to Palo Alto with a friend that he had met at the Tule Lake internment camp. When I photographed James, he was 85 years old and still operating his own landscaping business. James and Taka were the first people I photographed who had been incarcerated at Topaz.
“Whether it’s a dam breach that could destroy the third largest watershed in the world (the Mackenzie), tailings ponds that are approaching the size of a great lake, or tanker traffic on Canada’s pristine west coast: it’s clear that our country’s water is in trouble,” said David Lavallee, Director of White Water, Black Gold. “Most people do not know that the tar sands impacts actually span half the country.”
The principal, Sharon Fougner, said the following:
- They use rocks as look outs for predator watching and to keep them warm or cool.
Tragically, like young gays and lesbians of previous years, today’s transgender children may fall victim to a mental health professional’s insistence that such behavior is abnormal or transitional. Some professionals may also claim that a transgender behavior can be cured or reprogrammed. There are documented cases of children and adults being subjected to noxious methods including: shock therapy, confinement, institutionalization, violence, verbal abuse, etc. No matter how well-intended these activities amount to nothing more than human rights’ abuse. No adult or child should be subject to such abuse in effort to make him or her conform to social stereotypes, particularly when varying gender identities are part of the human experience.
HSN offers customers a way to shop by design style and browse the House Beautiful Marketplace’s impressive array of furniture, lighting, rugs, wall art and accessories to complete the look of any room.
189 Spring Street
As Johnny walks through the caged wire door to make his entrance onto ‘The Street’, the shadows create similar bar patterns that not only suggest a jail-like institutional tone, but are reminiscent of Cathy’s birdcage and the world of ‘backstage’ (again, through contrast, implying that The Street is a performance space). Johnny rolls his neck as he enters the stage, an actor preparing for performance. The structure of what plays out on ‘The Street’ is governed by three clear and distinct sections (Johnny’s interviews with each of the three witnesses to Sloan’s murder). While ample attention has been given to ideological readings of these politically loaded segments in regards to racial and Cold War tensions, it is in this case perhaps more fruitful to approach them as a point of comparison with a seemingly irrelevant Hollywood musical, On The Town (1949). Both Shock Corridor and On The Town are divided into three main narrative threads: the numbers that introduce the romantic storylines in On The Town are Ann Miller’s “Prehistoric Man” routine (she outright demands for a pre-theory primal man, with “no psychoanalysis”), Betty Garrett’s “Come Back to My Place” number (Frank Sinatra sings his desire to visit New York landmarks of a time past while she aggressively invites sexual contact instead, repeating “come back to my place” in reply to his various requests for cab destinations) and the “Miss Turnstyles” ballet (Vera-Ellen and Gene Kelley tells the story of Miss Turnstyles journey from small town USA to New York, laced with a nostalgia for a past America). All three numbers are predicated about an attempt to reclaim a semblance of lost past.
Outstanding caregivers act as an advocate on behalf of their clients. Excellent caregivers not only provides the daily care that is needed, but also acts as a facilitator to their clients. This requires the ability to be a good listener, in order to know what their clients needs are and effectively communicating to the client and family.
To reproduce and bring up children?
Member States, and their survivors;
Landau realizes that this makes Blair a spy. Nevertheless, he decides he'll deliver the notebooks anyway, which Harry finds startling.
It was an older guy this time who asked, “Why don’t they have tails like other monkeys?”
So things pile up they never use
Program writing has definitely come a long way since I was young, along with the ever expanding choice of channels, and the shows themselves are a lot more educational than I ever remember. This is a good thing, and I’m pleased my kids can actually learn something from them. However, after being at home for nearly four year and in that time, having been exposed to pretty much every kids show in existence, there are a few things that irritate the heck out of me:
The retired accessories and Definitely Decorative (including Décor Elements) lists are now available, unlike our stamp sets (which will be available until May 31st) these items are only available while supplies last! If you would like me to send you the excel file please send me an email at pebbles4@ptd.net and I'll gladly email it to you. Please don’t hesitate to ask me any questions!
and show everything to you
Review Copy Source: Publisher (Cybils review copy)
The San Francisco event was Obama’s eighth in California in the past month, a sign of the Golden State’s continued importance in his bid for a second term.
This is particularly satisfying because it's been a long road to get to the level of competency I now have. I have been doing what is now my main job for roughly three and a half years. There are three main books of business that my division deals with and Book A is one I've always been well acquainted with as I worked in that unit for about three years. But Books B and C I've never worked in and I was never trained in them. But I've finally gotten the level of knowledge necessary to talk about it with interested candidates so that I can say what we are asking them in terms of review work. I also have enough experience, finally, to be able to speak with potential reviewers and not be nervous. These are all physicians, some of them arrogant and self important, a few who are unabashed about telling me they make $1,000 in fifteen minutes (that happened, an anesthesiologist who I inadvertently made feel guilty for saying such a thing). So it is gratifying to know that I am, actually a professional in my field.
I had forgotten that home is not always comfortable. The church will always be my home, whether comfortable or not. When my grandparents died, it was still home. When we were burgled, three times, it was still home. When my parents invite over all sorts of strangers who make me feel a little unsettled, it is still home.
A big part of an unschooling parent's job is finding ways for our kids to learn what they want to learn. It's just something we do. In our case, we're in an urban area with lots of resources, so it's not even that hard.
Article 116
I was very fortunate to have the opportunity of reading The Other Side of Blue and it didn't disappoint. This is a beautifully written book, poignant and delicate, yet brought into stark relief in the Caribbean sunshine.
You can point a finger
And then there was the burger. THE Burger. Here, the taste of the locally sourced, humanely raised, organic beef was clearly superior. I'll never go back.
and move ever carefully
Credits go to Berna Datema, Crowabout Studio, Laurie Anne, Studio Bethany, and Bleuesse.
Better to label these actors “Manipulators” than “Conspirators”. Whether the sparks were created, facilitated, or simply exploited is besides the point. In every case, the manipulator(s) had an ultimate goal, with a broad but definite plan, well in advance, just waiting an opportune moment to enact.
As before, Rob and I got up at O-My_Gosh its early and headed to the range, stopping at Starbucks for some coffee as we went.
So making my own short on no money is kind of like...what every guy who ever made a short probably went through.
Oct 29 Quebec City, QC — Grand Theatre de Quebec
What do you trust? Who do you trust? I cannot give you the answer, but what I know, I give you; what the Lord speaks, I recall:
I’m sorry. But it’s riDiculous that I am Genetically related to a WHOLE group of people who match me in several ways; yet, I am not welcomed or allowed to converse with them
These are the types of sketches you need to be practicing when you are doodling, these basic drawing techniques. Think of a action like holding a phone and try and draw it on your note pad. Think how you might draw a gesture such as waving, or pointing, action arrows help a lot in capturing motion. Study how others draw storyboards. I find that thinking about people as Lego figures helps, I always find that these simple characters can capture a whole host of interactions just by playing with poses and making a small additions to what they hold and how their faces look. People don’t get represented much simpler than this, plus if you use the real Lego’s you can practice drawing what you see.
I told my friend last night that I was going to write a book called Pregnancy: The Shit No One Tells You That Could Happen. I’m convinced no one tells you as then no one would want to get pregnant! But seriously, I feel like I could collaborate with other moms like the All Knowing Julie and we could write both an informative and humorous book about the random crap that can happen when you’re pregnant – more than just morning sickness and weight gain. Maybe it could help others stop with Dr. Google, too.
these verses also are on my heart as i think about communion and remembering what Jesus has won for us and done for us…
After the first few minutes of walking around and getting used to the initial expressions of bafflement I actually begin to feel quite comfortable – the pink slippers are particularly soft. Most of the facial expressions I glimpse seem to suspect banter rather than anything sinister. And it’s easy to see how you could spend the day in this clobber.
My dearest baby bean,
At this point Freddie would be looking up at the
After Mass one mother told me I had to keep working on her sons – she clearly wants a Priest in the family: great! But it must be hard for a parent to hold an ideal which runs so contrary to what society expects. The world wants us to marry, to be successful, to earn money, to have our own house, to have independence. Christ wants more: he wants everything we have, everything we are, set apart. Set apart for what? The plebs sancta Dei, the Holy People of God, whom he calls his priests to serve without limits, searching out the lost and gathering all into the safety of sheepfold.
As you read the cases below, ask yourself, would I award damages? Some cases have been settled and some are still making their way through the courts. You will have to go to “The Stella Awards” and purchase their book to get all the outcomes.
Back to the recipe. This cookie is very simple: just mix nuts, sugar and the flavor of your choice. Shape, bake for 10 minutes, and voila! All that is left is making the egg white icing and ice the cookies.
Singer, “Take That”
Discography
I stuck around, for what felt like an hour, chatting here and there between customers and their wants, and then I started home. Half a block from the Bagdad I saw a short, young, and attractive woman cornered against a wall by a man that was obviously not her friend. I recognized him by a description, given to the bagdad staff, as someone that had been harrasing another customer.
I always get head rushes from our favorite dishes, gan bian si ji dou (dry fried stringbeans) and mapou tofu (spicy tofu), and finally last night, when the rush was bigger than usual, Googled it.
sydney's 3rd and 4th birthdays, along with the boy's 1st,
2- Reduce the oven temperature to 300F and line a baking sheet with parchment paper.
me, my boy and my bestie.
Sometimes I may see a peculiar/horrible/worthy of criticism programme/advertisement on television and come up with an idea for a video of my own, or a sketch. Unless a programme/ad is especially popular or notorious, it's fairly unlikely that I would be able to find it on youtube or torrent it (gasp), and literally impossible anyway since my internet connection seems to take a ring road through The Treacle Dimension before it gets to my computer. This technology allows me to rip whatever I need from my Sky+ recording and do what I like.
His essay Containing Chaos (unfortunately no longer freely visible in it's entirety) begins:We are now engaged in a conflict that will dictate whether we succeed or fail in the 21st century. Our adversary in this conflict is, in short, the threat posed by globalization.and concludes (my emphasis):Disruptions that result in societal and economic chaos occur most readily in societies where the health and vigor of a society has decayed. In other words, the social and economic system that the nation-state administers must be seen as fair and just, and it must deliver tangible results to the greatest number of people possible. Anything less than this and societal breakdown becomes extremely likely should disruption occur, since the allure of participation in oppositional groups, from black-market crime to guerrilla/terrorist groups, will outweigh outcomes available through participation in the status quo. In short, the nation-state will lose its legitimacy with large subsets of its population.
17. See Paul Sheehan’s taboo-breaking article, “Race War of Black Against White”, Sydney Morning Herald, 20th May 1995 and Larry Elder, “When the Bad Guy is Black”, Jewish World Review, 10th March 2000, http://www.amren.com. Electronic archive.
Last night in my dreams
313) a wonderful evening shared with long time friends, girls having the time the of their lives dressing up in wedding dresses, jacuzzi and pizzas, playing records...yes, old records on a record player! And seeing our teens reconnect and just all being happy together!
It's a great excuse to buy cute exercise wear
- There's a nice news section on the home page to see the latest that's going on.
Stage Two: Shame and Doubt. You’re in dance class. Your teacher asks you to demonstrate a new move or step. You want to… but this is more than insecurity, is this a panic attack? You may experience the feeling of astro-projecting out of your body and your confidence is trapped in a box. You can’t see your body moving right, even if it is. You start to wonder why you are in the class at all. A welling feeling is starting in your stomach and starting to ooze into your face. Irrational thoughts have taken over. You may wish to start screaming and crying. Please don’t. Save your sobs for a more appropriate time and place.
We welcomed the little devil into our hearts.
